CAPE TOWN. Less than twenty years ago, South Africa’s clinic research was rated as among the world’s very best and definitely the best on the African continent.
Fitting song, I thought, as I searched my soul.
Rustie – Love Frequency
Gentleness – Do I approach challenging people and circumstances with a gentle kindness?
Like I said earlier, we just needed something to do. There was no purpose or message we wanted to give out, we just wanted to have fun ourselves, and if other people liked it, that was a bonus.
Was Chief Constable Sims, of West Mids Police, part of ‘the arm of the State’ when he praised Unite Against Fascism and attacked the EDL in the Birmingham Mail/Post?
One person who can take away this pain.
Finding rest is still hard. Almost a year later and I feel worn out most of the time by the thinking, the worries, and the constant pondering of what might come next. But I know also that sleeping and resting are so important. So, here's to another week, another night and day of looking for rest.
NAB booth #C4345
The thing with all the YA I've read is that it's all been recommended to me by my mother (hence 'Heaven Can Wait' is dedicated to her). I won't do her the disservice of revealing her age to the whole internet, but let's just say she celebrated her ruby wedding anniversary in August. I know there's a big audience for YA among As who really can't claim to be very Y anymore (except at heart, right mum?), but I'm not sure that group do a lot of social networking.
the list goes on......
‘What, not another one? The one with Sean Connery and Uma Thurman was awful…’
I decided to use the Plant A Little Love Borders and Centers set. When I was trying to decide on a project I knew that I wanted to make some sort of flowers. That was when I decided that these borders and centers would be perfect for a flower center.
It’s only because of Him that I’m even alive today. It’s only because of Jesus that I have a roof over my head, that I have money in my pocket, that I have food in my refrigerator, that I have shoes on my feet. No matter what, He is the only reason I have anything. The Lord has changed my life so much. I have friends now, and I can be a friend. You would not have wanted me to be your friend before I found Jesus, but now I can be a true friend.
“…Waheguru Ji Ka Khalsa should keep his hair unshorn, have flowing beard and have simple Dastaar which saves him from impiety. Then the Sikhs asked what would happen to those Amritdhari who start cutting their hair or do not keep their hair covered. The Guru replied that they would be stupid and will lose their sensibility. It is a blemish to remain bareheaded…Always keep two turbans. When the bigger turban is removed, the smaller be kept. The smaller turban should not be removed.” (Bijai Mukat Dharam Shastra – Sakhi-8)
The part that really struck me was the fact that pigs are classed as one of the most intelligent species outside the primate family! In fact, a pig has the intelligence of a 3 yr child. Amazing yet sad huh?
But the real star of the story is Kate Winslet as Rose. It's really Rose's story. It's Rose looking back at her first love, the man who inspired her to break free of the trappings of the upper class. It's Rose who grows throughout the story. I don't know how I missed that before.
This Easter weekend was great. I spend it with a friend, going to the west coast of Ireland. Staying in a lovely B&B in Salthill, within walking distance of Galway.
I’d never thought to say before
The Army said it is “currently monitoring same-gender sex crime for a potential increase in forcible sodomy and other sex offenses related to the disassociation of homosexuality from the crime itself.”
Bingham received the first ever National Geographic Society archaeological grant and went on to lead three expeditions back to the site in 1912, 1914, and 1915. National Geographic then, for the first time in its history, dedicated an entire issue to Machu Picchu.
My friend Knappsterino often films at venues like this down in Bristol. I noticed several people doing just that, so doubtless the results will be up on YouTube soon. Meanwhile, someone posted a bit of Daydream Believer from the Glasgow gig:
From....one tired mom of boys.
I forgot that I started blogging not because I expected people to read but I should be able to read what happened with me and my children and grandchildren should read as what happened in Life at Abhi.
And now here I am... 10 years, 1 failed marriage, 1 ruined credit report, and 3 kids later and I still don't know what in the H I want to do with my life. I've gone back to school to take more classes a few times since I graduated (I even went through a lengthy, somewhat humiliating process to get that one school to say, ok, we'll let you come back if you promise to get As this time). And I've thought about what I would do if I went back a million times. Something always gets in the way. Money. Kids. Time. Fear. Whatever. I love school, though. I am being totally honest when I say this: I would be a student for the rest of my life if I had that luxury. I would take every class I ever wanted to take, learn as much as I possibly could, become as "well-rounded" as they get, if it were something I could feasibly do. But I can't. I should go back. I will go back. But I need to make some sort of decision soon about what I will do once I'm back. What classes will I take? What degree will I pursue? What is it that I really want out of life??? Who knows if I ever figure this out. In the meantime, it's time I start the process of getting something done toward this end, though.
He's crazy about them and he could play fetch for hours. He'll actually bring you a ball if you ask him "Where is the ball?". It's so funny seeing him search for one :)
Saturday Full body strength and conditioning with 20 lbs weights, new world of exhaustion hit me. So let me frame this I have just finished a workout in which I can barely stand near the end and my kids come up and ask me to go on a bike ride, So I do it no need to punish them for my stupidity, I drop my daughter off at dance and when I bike home my 4 year old wants to play street hockey, say again I do it for an hour then bike back to pick up my daughter from dance, she gets home and wants to play soccer for an hour so again I do it. It is 1500 hours (3pm) and my step counter has reached 16000 steps.
Yes, I do believe that Jesus died on the cross and arose 3 days later....once....not every year.
Although not blessed with the patience, passing range and skill of Xavi, Iniesta or Fabregas, the Scotland midfielder possesses a work rate, technique and ability to break up play which has always been a pre-requisite in counter attacking sides.
So why is this world so hung up on "perfection?" Maybe it's just me, but I don't want "perfection," I want real. A real face, real hair, a real smile...and yes, real breasts - I'll take a real pair of 32B's over a fake set of 38D's any day. And I'll bet if you ask any man - at least any man with more depth than a 'Ken' doll - he'll tell you the same thing. We don't want perfection, we want real. We want to see a woman for who she really is and what she really looks like.
Today I'm pleased to have the very sweet, very wonderful Keris Stainton for interview! Her debut novel, Della Says: OMG! was published 6th May. I asked her several questions and this is what she has to say!
Her gown is brown.
Day 8
I always try and take my daughter out when I am harvesting herbs so she will learn about them and be interested in them at an early age. It is my duty as a Mother to teach her what I know about herbs and healing so it can be passed down. It is so much more rewarding to go out and do little activites with your children instead of keeping them "glued to the tube"! The TV stays cold pretty much all day until the evening when we watch a few hours of news and a little bit of the History channel.
* Protein-rich conditioners work best on damaged hair.
At very least, ALL academics of any ethics should challenge APARTHEID and lack of religious freedom, so that at very least, the Universities that awarded those degree holding racists and bad legislators will have their educations revoked and thus shamed into unelectibility. HEAR THAT ACADEMICS, do not act and too be lumped together on the blackball list of all educated civil and polite society types world wide. For being racist and religious supremacist, for tacit approval of the above 2 via silence ALL degree holding individuals will become DEGREELESS, should not be allowed to apply at foreign universities, will become unemployable and unelectable!
Spring has hit here in the Mid Atlantic. With that comes lacrosse practice and play practice and running here and there and everywhere (Seussical influence as of late).
Close by me forever
So whilst cleaning and organizing my work room, it became clear to me I had a hording problem.
I stopped because I felt like I was in a competition with everyone-I was trying to keep up with the Jones'.
Amboy Dukes- Pony Express (Call Of The Wild LP- 1973)
Psalms 16:8 I have set the LORD always before me, He is at my right hand, I shall not be moved.
in the unity beyond intellect when the intellect stands away from beings and then stands away from itself, and then is illumined by the inscruptable depths of wisdom.
Another excellent organizing companion is often a qualified est coordinator. That is similar to finding a have preliminary who can maneuver your monetary deliver safely straight into coast. In addition there are legal professionals which specialize in property legislations, therefore a necessary organizing application can be analysis on the requirements associated with probable consultants.
Try these out at your next party. Or just to be safe (and because you want to!) pre-test them by yourself (so you get to eat all the chips) and tell me what you think!
What I want to know is, WHAT IS WRONG WITH THIS WORLD? This dog came from a shelter, who microchipped the dog. I find "follow-up" in shelters to be pretty much non-existant. And really? How can it be? The sheer numbers alone... how can one really do any follow up at all? I go to bed at night wondering how many dogs (cats, critters) are being abused tonight, while my dogs are safe, warm, tucked in bed next to me. I worry what if one of my dogs escapes and lands in the wrong hands? I obsess about making sure they are attended to even in my own fenced yard! In this dog rescue business, I hear EVERYTHING. People love to share this shit. I don't really take time to wonder what the motive is, cuz anything beyond education, is just a waste. I believe it's all we see and do in rescue that set us up for Compassion Fatigue of Animal Care Work. And in my opinion, that is killer. Oh you can try to bury your head in the sand, pretend it doesn't happen, but fact is, it's probably happening in your very neighborhood, in one form or another. We could go thru the "what- ifs" all day long, but the bottom line is, if we know of this and do nothing, aren't we as much to blame? Indeed.... ponder on that for a while folks.
But this strategy didn’t work. The Brough workers and the anti-arms activists were soon cheering and applauding each other’s comments, particularly those about diversifying to work on renewable energy to move away from arms and keep jobs at Brough. Today, we were able to tell the workers at Brough that we’re on their side. Serious government investment in renewable energy – a far more stable prospect for the future than arms – would make use of engineering skills in Britain and could save lives in Bahrain.
I will again quote one more paragraph sourced from the Introductory Pages of David Livingstone’s book (pg 2):
The measuring cups were also available and looked just like the spoons...just FYI!
One of my tips when working in a large firm was to get friendly with the postal staff, the handyman, the receptionist, i.t and the security guard. That way you can get favours when you need them and pull off the impossible.
For a long time........
Copyright (c) Press Association Ltd. 2010, All Rights Reserved.
All these tragedies proved too much for Carlotta, and she spent the sixty years remaining to her as a recluse back in Europe, mad as a hatter.
1 - Night Watch and Day Watch
I know how he feels on a personal level about this case because I have read his thoughts in the media!
Stephanie Meyer's face could stare adoringly into the camera and say, "You fell in love with Edward and his sparkling skin, now you too can shine is the sun, with this amazing apparatus."
Then I'll say I'm sorry and I'll wrap my arms around your body
Thank you so much to my amazingly patient web designer Emily Thompson of Emmarie Web Design who worked with me to create the shop. If you need help designing your website or blog, check her out; she's awesome.
Wish me luck…
He reasons that since Mi Roo thinks sex and love are one in the same, does that mean she had sex when she wrote about the scorching love affair she had? Mi Roo’s uncomfortable with the type of question telling him it’s very private. Joon slams his hand down on the table. He’s unable to flesh out her character if he doesn’t know these intimate details. He explains that an artist trying to pain a nude must have a model who is willing to take off their clothes. Mi Roo asks why she needs to take off her clothes. Hehe, he explains that it’s a metaphor.
James Morrison (the stranger) is very realistic as the mountain man. Bill Buchanan from 24 is one of the many notable TV roles for the former circus tight rope walker. Interestingly, he is also a stage actor, yoga instructor, and film maker.
But in case you're wondering... I loved it. I absolutely loved it. I thought it was funny, engaging and (dare I say) even scary at times. One last notice before we get into the swing of things, THERE WILL BE SPOILERS. This post is intended for those who have seen the film and have some questions, comments etc...
From the center of the universe
not yet mechanized beyond
What makes this process even more difficult is how hard it is to fire someone here. Sometimes I think having to fire someone is what the French fear most. It is the culmination of someone's failure to judge the employee's abilities, and who likes to admit they're a poor judge? Certainly not French management. It's also a ginormous legal hassle, full of proving, discussing, documenting, blah blah blah, shoot-me-now kind of crap. So, obviously, no one likes this part either.
Americans have an entirely different outlook on what constitutes a work day. More often than not, we go in early to get out early, but in France, people don’t think the early bird gets the worm. Most people mosey on into their offices around nine-thirty or ten am, and head back home around seven-thirty or eight.
You answer to and Bull Ride a
I’m mostly disappointed that I ripped two holes in my nice black work pants. Actually, I’m also a little disappointed that not one person pulled over and no pedestrian stopped to ask me if I was okay.
It's still snowing and I haven't gotten much packing done this morning. So the obvious thing to do is make pancakes. Flip! See you tomorrow.
The roadbed around the peninsula is now starting to get to a good height. I can just visualise the trains climbing this grade now!!
Big plantation concession too!
My question is why are you or anyone else so afraid of saying sorry when (or if?) you muck something up? You’re not perfect. No one is. You make mistakes. We all do. So deal with it. Deal with the fact that you make mistakes. And deal with it by having the guts or the conscience to offer a sincere apology.
Lou, you, particularly, should appreciate what is going on here. You worked for Procter & Gamble. Would it be fair to claim you are a satan-worshipper, as Procter & Gamble’s old logo “proved?” Of course such a charge is bizarre, ungrounded in fact, and damaging to people who have no intention to worship satan (I hope!). Since you worked for a company that literally had to change its logo due to unfair and wild claims, you should be particularly sensitive to wild and unfair claims against others. And yet, here you are with a letter read by more than a half million people, passing along wild and unfair claims.
You don't know someone in the hospital did care. That they reported the abuse you are experiencing repeatedly. To their manager, to their manager's manager, to the Care Quality Commission. You don't know because no-one did anything, nothing ever changes now, the torture is your daily routine. You don't know the word for torture, but you could give a better account of what it means than a prisoner in Guantanamo.
so much to do and not enough time............
The brief was ‘Opposites’, to make neckwear – experimenting with print, shape and/or colour. I should explain the way my imagination works is if there is a box with the obvious inside I’m jumping on top of it like a deranged rebel punk, the obvious doesn’t appeal to me at all, and so the cogs started turning.
2 TBSP heavy cream
~Dr. Seuss
Wonder how many people can remember 'The Dunny', 'Out house' or what ever you like to call it these days. Few people have them now thank goodness but I have come to realize through my father 'the smell and acceptance of the inside toilet/lavertory'.
I ran to the garage and returned with the shovel and started to scoop up the possum. To my horror, I saw that the animal was still breathing. The puppy had almost completely removed the possum’s hide and taken several big bites out of it. I could not see how it was alive, but it was.
The fervor for which some Christian writers have described being given over to the ecstatic worship of God border on the sexual:
C is for Crickets. That’s what we feed to our fire belly toads.
I like to think of myself as a realist who doesn’t believe in fairy tales, but sometimes fairy tales do happen and come true.
With this book, your whole family will be ‘doing research’ along with you. You’ll find yourselves appreciating the ‘pests’ - slugs, grubs, scale and all. You’ll be saying ‘Hey! Look at this!’ And they’ll take the book and find things to show you in return. (Try it out on your guests!)
The ESDC estimated that the project would provide 4700 jobs, including 2420 office jobs, and would stimulate nearly 1900 other jobs in the city. However, the project was initially promoted as providing 10,000 office jobs, a pledge revised after the developer converted proposed residential space to more lucrative luxury housing.
An arrest warrant is only as good as its enforcement. Winston directly admits that the “good guys” in the Pentagon, on behalf of an international alliance of 138 nations, are prepared to use these liens as legal grounds for mass arrests.
Getting a second (or third!) language under your belt can really make a difference in your career especially in the eyes of firms who look favorably at multilingual job candidates. If you work for a multinational corporation, a second or third language might open up job opportunities with this or other companies who operate globally. Often bilingual job candidates can be worth their weight in gold to a company.
$72 million - worth of the ministry advertising the Last Day
I love shopping, I especially love it when its craft related and I went on a little spree this week on the net and bought a few things on the net.
I was pretty tired yesterday after my early call from Australia and my fun day on the hill at Kintail, one hill and the legs are sore, I must get fit? As I walked off down the track past the end of the South Cluanie ridge I felt great. This is unusual as in the past Creag a’ Mhain is the end of a long day of 7 -9 Munros depending on how one does it this classic walk. I worked out that Teallach my dog had done that 9 Munros – 7 times in his life every time all in one day with me and had twice attempted the Great traverse of the South and North Cluanie plus a few others of 19 -20 Munros in a day. On the successful attempt with Teallach when we stopped at the Cluanie Inn for a break he was not impressed as we continued down the road to Carn Ghulasaid and the rest of a huge 23 hour day. We travelled very light and left some more food behind the Cluanie Inn, some bivy but it was “light and slow” a pair of Walshes “running shoes” and minimal kit and lots of snacks and drinks. It was how fast you could do them in these days but what a feeling being out on such a special place, travelling light, running much of the easy bits of the ridge and being fit enough to enjoy these wonderful hills. You become as one with the hills on days like that and each point a personal battle with the mind and body to continue. The knowledge I had of these ridges was great as you knew where to go and the map was only a check with the Munros marked and roughly the times for each one to remind you and try to keep to a planned schedule. Each Munro done, was one less to do. What a companion Teallach was, what a hill dog and he kept me going all that long day and many others. He was so attuned to the hill, he never chased anything, wild life were safe as were people, but not their food. He just enjoyed the openness of the hill, the wild land, what a companion. At the end of a huge day we were both struggling and he was following in my footsteps unusual for him. He was still able to rush ahead when he saw a wee lochan or mud and dive in.It was two weary companions who struggled off back to the car and exhaustion, I can still feel the pain when it all ended. What a dog for the 12 years of his life, he saw so much and did so much. As I walked down the track yesterday to the Inn I could see him bounding ahead, maybe picking up a bit of bog wood or diving into a river, to be young and daft again. Now it is a different and older person who wandered down the track one Corbett was still a grand day and it is funny now we treated the hills in our youth.
I first heard the song Truest Intentions as the opening webpage for a local music festival, The Big Time Out.....I was hooked, where did this song come from and who's singing it - I watched it over and over leading up to the festival....(not the opening page anymore....)
Before I saw the actual optometrist, a female assistant measured my eyes. She told me to stay very still, and as I sat there, squirming and edgy, I asked "Is this the part where you blow air in my eyes?" I couldn't stay still thinking about it. "No, that's the next thing, " she replied. So I did stay still.
The results these actions yield are undeniable. Through teacher satisfaction survey results, we have learned that leaders who learn and apply these actions with teachers develop teachers that are more satisfied with their work and gain a renewed belief that they are making a difference in the lives of their students.
So, eh… God + Calendars + Lightbulbs = Business Genius?
Happy crafting! Oh and you could paint them with your kids; we are planning on painting ours the first week of school. More photos coming soon.
terrible curse of the elderly
I just want to watch and absorb the spectacle.
Alex Wiles and Chase Young, who are totally not gay, thought it would be funny to shoot up a sign urging voters to vote against Amendment One — the anti-gay amendment that will go before North Carolina voters on the 8th of May — and post a video of it on YouTube. The video quickly went viral, and the two found out that not everybody thinks gunplay and homophobia are a cute combination. Alex quickly took the video down from his YouTube account, but by then hundreds, if not thousands, of people had already downloaded it, and it began popping up in other places on YouTube. Now Chase Young, aptly described by Chrislove as “the snickering asshole of a cameraman,” has asserted a copyright claim, and the videos are disappearing from YouTube as fast as they can be uploaded. I linked to the original video in my last post and have changed the link three times as the linked videos disappeared. It’s not my job to help Chase Young find all the YouTube links. You can still see the video on the website of WSOC.
“Dear friends, do not be surprised at the painful trial you are suffering, as though something strange were happening to you. But rejoice that you participate in the sufferings of Christ, so that you may be overjoyed (blissfully happy) when his glory is revealed.”
Maja´s gift was a huge plastic sword, and Aidan loves it. He asked me what it was, which was nice as he´s never had a toy weapon before. So he´s slowly losing his innocence, but as long as it´s with a plastic sword which he´s convinced is a pirate sword, we´ll be fine :)
Trouper Broke
“From the Caspian to the English Channel. Light it with your electric lamp. Streets, houses, offices. I’ll arrange the finance. What do you say? Agreed?”
#24. Thankful for my children's friends. I love watching them play with their friends and I am so glad they have good friends from our church.
Mrs. Obama is well on her way, however. In July, she announced commitments from major grocery corporations, including America's largest grocer, Walmart, and America's largest pharmacy chain, Walgreens, to build or transform as many as 1,500 grocery stores in food deserts over the next five years. The new stores--and outlets that have been revamped to include things like fresh and cut produce-- will offer healthy foods cheek by jowl with the standard fare of processed and junk foods.
Mafdal-Bayit Yehud-Ichud Leumi: Winners
With the merger of SOE and SCYTL, that won't work (if SCYTL's voting system is used). When there are two truly independent sources of information, the public can perform its own "audit" by matching one number against the other.
I’m fairly biased because my grandmother grew up next door to his house in Indianapolis and was one of the neighborhood children that he taught his poems to and shared readings with back, back in the day.
In X-Factor #207 the boys have an argument over their ambiguous relationship, Julio is mad because he thinks Star has been spending time with everyone else, specifically Layla. Star wants an open relationship, since he's really confused about his new found emotions and sexuality. But he wants Rictor to be his "anchor".
I made these oven fries last week, and I apologize for just now getting around to posting them. I was so happy with how these turned out. The only thing I would do differently is cut them a little thicker. Mine cooked a little faster than the directions called for. Next time I'll cut them at least 1/3 or 1/4-inch thick.
What was the very first book you remember reading and really loving, and why?
Author:Wikipedia: “Murray Leinster (June 16, 1896 – June 8, 1975) was a nom de plume of William Fitzgerald Jenkins, an award-winning American writer of science fiction and alternate history. He wrote and published over 1,500 short stories and articles, 14 movie scripts, and hundreds of radio scripts and television plays.”
I remember the first time I was harangued for being a journalist. It was Christmas Eve 1982 and I was home from college for a gathering of family and close friends.
After dusting the top with cocoa powder, I decorated the cake with fresh raspberries. Then I let it chill in the fridge for a few hours before unmolding it and adding the finishing touch - a nice red ribbon tied around the outside.
I don't know about you, but when I buy an article of clothing, I like options. Now, I don't always know right away what those different options will be, but that is part of the fun of shopping. You purchase a great piece and then bring it home to see how it will work in your closet.
In time to come the cross was not only made from iron, but also from silver, and even gold. The dove was added to represent the Holy Ghost. After the dreadful persecutions following the revocation of the Edict of Nantes, it was replaced with a pearl, symbolizing a tear. My own cross still has the dove.
It is a good thing Hashahar is so delicious because Israelis pay about 20% more for Nutella than we do in the United States. Kashrut approval and importing the product impact the price in Israel, of course, but it doesn’t mean that Israelis will blindly accept the higher prices. In 2008, Nutella was at the center of a very different class action lawsuit in Israel than its maker just settled in the US. Its Israeli importer was forced to give out 91 tons of Nutella for free after consumers rose up and protested the fact that jars were reduced in size but not in price.
Negative: Defiance, aggression, visual impact, strain.
Well this morning I got up and did a walk only because I was forced to. I walked from my house this to Marsh. I went to get me 10- 32 oz bottles of Gatorade, and 2 packs of Yogurt. I carried that shit back home because I refused to let a petty fuck bring me down. MF think I need him, but he need to realize that I don’t. MF did all that complaining about me being over my Grandmother’s house and he was lonely, but the MF ain’t did shit or made shit any easier for my healing process. This MF had the nerve to wake up talking about someone sending me some pictures of them, then wanna claim he had a cramp… I’m cool…I hope he is fucking around on me…shit I’m not having sex so I’m coo..I can’t have the sex that I want anyways so it’s not like I’m burning any damn calories having boring unexciting sex…either I’m on top or him…So oh well
--that I hated the push and pull we did for control on a daily basis
This is what I made with one of them. This is an image from my great grandmother, Beverly Cowan. This was drawn in the 1920's when she was a kid. Yes! a kid! She had mad talent!! We have several of her drawings out in stamps and we are adding to them!! We have even had a company copy one of our images and try to play it off as their own! I'm sorry but that don't fly with me! I'm proud to have my great grandmother's images in our collection.. Check it out...
So, is this Aspen trip going to change anything? Liam seems determined to make it work with Hope. Is he just very stubborn? He stuck it out with Steffy, and it took Hope a long time to redirect him back to her. Now he has tunnel vision in regards to Hope. It probably doesn’t help that he feels responsible for taking Hope’s virginity. Still, Hope and Liam’s interactions are so juvenile that it’s hard to imagine how he can stand it. I don’t know. I get anxious just watching them together. That and maybe a little nauseous.
Make us owls – and we react badly: allow us to be flowers and something else will shine thru.
Condemnation of anti-semites (by your definition anyone who takes their refinement of anti-liberalism too far and names its components) is an example of Criticizing Those To Your Right. (Which Auster has complained of many times but I cannot find a formal definition of.)
Once I got back home it was time to mow AGAIN and as predicted the belt on the yard tractor came apart. I just got the thing back last Saturday from Spring maintenance which had to be done early this year and had a new deck roller, blades, choke cable and oil changed and the guy said the belts looked fine. Sigh every Spring it is always the same thing something breaks the first few mowing until you get it all taken care of.
1 recipe tahini sauce (see previous)
Just like animated features MUST be for kids, despite the incredible demand for adult subject matter animated films that has exploded in USA (look at the success of anime!).
It is very important in all types of barbecuing, and grilling too for that matter, to keep the surface of the meat well moistened. A sop (mopping sauce) is ideal in doing that as well as adding more flavor. There are many recipes varying in using beer, ketchup, chicken broth, Worcestershire but the key ingredients are always vinegar and lemon.
Naomi King 1
Tinsley Ellison, WE LOVE YOU SO VERY MUCH! Praise God for your beautiful life and the amazing family you were hand picked to be a part of. We pray daily that you will grow confident and strong in the ways of the Lord and follow Him all of the days of your life. I can't wait to see you grow and mature, and we look forward to sharing and making many precious memories together.
The antlers on the wall tie it all together.
Also, winds will continue to subside as the low moves away. It will remain breezy through Tuesday afternoon, but nowhere near as windy as Monday. We may see gusts in the 20 to 30mph range the first half of the day Tuesday.
"I like the word delay better."
Well, okay, I can't remember every decision I've ever made, but if it wasn't the best it was close.
a beer at the bar,
The Nasty Girl (Germany) directed by Michael Verhoeven
But perhaps, yet again. the truth is more subtle than that.
Flopping down on to the floor next to the bed she stared at her bound hands then at the black rope wrapped around her body holding the vibrator into place. Sighing loudly distracted her from hear the hum but she surely felt it when he remotely turned on the vibrator. She turned her eyes to the doorway but it remained empty. The steady slow pulse was just enough to make things uncomfortable for her. She shifted down lower on her back lifting her knees off the carpet, her legs parted.
My homeschool community plays a huge role in my life. We spend a good amount of time, surrounded by other homeschool families. Our children are not raised by us only. They are raised by our community... our village, you might say. It helps us feel connected in an otherwise fairly disconnected world. We've often talked about how ideally we'd live in some sort of modern commune. Sure, we all like to close our doors behind us, when we're done with the day. But can you imagine the advantages of always having a friend nearby to help out, when you need them? You can eat breakfast at your own place or get together with a bunch of your commune member friends and eat as a group. Can you imagine a community garden, chickens, maybe even a cow... and you are not alone in taking care of it all.
The later appointment of medical personnel did not improve the conditions. They were appointed for their loyalty towards the British invasion; not for their medical capability. They maltreated the Boere.
I just LOVE this kid!
To say we huffed and puffed up it is an understatement and in all honesty, two miles in and I wasn’t really sure where we were.To make matters even worse we came to a point where 3 roads meet and we didn’t take the one that would take us down the steep hill we had tried to avoid – oh well. Still it was a lovely route and gave us a few options for some different routes. Every cloud has a silver lining – we were so high up we could see the silver lining!!
Violation points are given for filth, food held at the wrong temperature, flies and mice, etc. Restaurants with 0 - 13 violation points receive a grade of A; those with 14 - 27 receive a B; and with 28 or more a C.
“White Zombie,” a motion picture distributed by United Artists, tells the story of the Zombies or “walking dead man” of the island, which is now at Loew’s.
:D
Also took a photo of the ”Cup Noodles” museum, however it was closed that day, much to the disappointment of us all. Yokohama is a rather photogenic area, been here several times and will go back again.
How embarrassing is that!
" Dark Shadows " deserves better than that crap you are abolut to foist on an unsuspecting audience .
As Schirmacher’s case shows, in some cases women are earning more than their spouses not because they are getting ahead but after their husband has experienced a setback.
Fact: I am somewhat lazy. Okay, maybe I am not lazy, but I hate driving to the store. Sooo, when I ran out of styrofoam tree foams I decided to make my own. Easy, easy, and it will save you a ton of money. AND, since YOU will be covering it up, who cares what is underneath the tissue paper!
Morning pages: You do pretty much the same thing everyday – just write, write, write until you have 3 pages. Fine. Once you’ve been doing it for a week, none of them are a big deal or special, they all just flow together and you realise that they’re all just blank and forgiving canvases to play with. None of it lasts and none of it matters, so you just do whatever you feel like writing in that moment. It doesn’t come out good or bad, it’s just you experimenting and indulging any ideas you have. Your responsibility is merely to be true to the moment and get it down.
Oh-oh but capitalism sold itself loan parcels, each time they sold them, they ended up owing each other more. debt debt debt got bigger and bigger between capitalists.
Meats: Veal, Pork
Let’s look at these practical tips:
In fact, between 1933 and 2005, we've had no less than seven variations on a theme about-a dees beeg monkey. Of course when it comes to Japan, once they get wind of an idea, they will retell the ever-lovin' heck out of it. Not only have they done this with giant monster stories, but also with war stories, cop stories, crime stories, Star Wars stories, invading alien stories, and any other movie that involves large-scale miniature sets and at least one out-of-place-looking American.
śuni caiva śva-pāke ca
The Make It Monday challenge is to use non-background stamps to make a background. I used a dandelion head from the Anniversary set, Botanical Silhouettes. It looks like little fireworks! The basic color scheme is melon berry, enchanted evening, and simply chartreuse (I used calypso coral, the indigo, and lucky limeade from the new SU in colors as ink.) And, of course, all the really GOOD patterned paper has glitter, so....... stickles.
In other life, there is a little bit of work to do, and schemes to hatch. I've given up worrying about why I play my crazy harmonicas with people, young or old. I must like to play, and I must think I am good at whatever it is I do. Lately I've been trying to broaden the scope a bit. Oddly that can involve knowing when not to play or when to lay back. I thought I was good at that, but I am noticing I am getting better at it. That is because I am listening to my judgement more on it and not that of others. People tend to want you to play too much or too little on songs. They just don't know best.
My poor kitties. I know they love us and love living with us. Who wouldn’t because they are spoiled horribly and their every whim is attended to and they get the prime sleeping spots on the bed. But they have had reason lately to wonder if being “our cats” is such a good thing after all.
i just might stop to check you out
the presets- "talk like that"
General William L. Nyland, USMC (Ret.)
“He’s a talented play-maker,” Silva said. “He’s good at getting his teammates involved but he can also score. And he’s a confident player.”
“It doesn’t take much to help to minimise such threats so that our native animals have the best chance of survival, and keeping your cat indoors is just one of the ways you can help,” he said.
Yes. I am a geek.
3. Learn – As a company grows, honest feedback is harder and harder to come by. You have to do what you can to keep it coming. This is crucial, because success and failure – especially failure – are valuable sources of organizational learning.
And while spraying things was fun while it lasted, it also led to a tantrum of epic proportions when I made him come inside for dinner. Don't love the tantrums, though I do love these little ones!
Nevertheless, it is a place of worship, and services are held there regularly. But although the sanctity of the chapel is respected, most people, especially a lot of tourists who know about it, have no religious purpose in going to this little place.
I prayed for many as I thought about this day and its impact on the heart...
This, after a friend suggested that I seem to feel inadequate because I did not have the benefit of formal education and that perhaps I should consider a course of some sort. In something that I’m passionate about.
Not surprisingly, there was a great deal of excitement that surrounded the inaugural trading day of the Market Vectors Vietnam ETF (VNM). The new vehicle began its journey on Friday, August 14, 2009.
you won’t get to his heart
Tenderness in the breasts and/or genitals.
Guard your heart. Your husband or wife should be the first person with whom you share your hearts desires, hurts, or secrets. A woman should never share her heart with another man and a man should not confide in a woman other than his wife. Protect your marriage relationship by giving your spouse exclusive insight into who you are as a person. Proverbs 31:11-12 says, “The heart of her husband doth safely trust in her, so that he shall have no need of spoil. She will do him good and not evil all the days of her life.” Do your spouse good and guard your heart only to be shared completely with them. The verse talks about the wife and how she is good to her husband, but it should work both ways in a marriage relationship.
Luckily as I'm a little bit of a squirrel I managed to find the hinges and bolts for the nest box door, and the main door.
Long sleeves - check
As gardeners in the South East are now banned from using hosepipes to water gardens (with more regions likely to follow), and we’ve had the driest winter for a long time, I thought it would be useful to put together some tips on how to sustain a garden where water is at a premium.
"The world changes, and Congress and the laws have to change with it," said Senate Banking Committee Chairman Phil Gramm (R-Texas), who has fought for years for the overhaul. Gramm said the bill would improve banking competition and stability.
Virgin Atlantic doesn’t seem to disappoint with its new onboard Upper Class offering. Now available for view on their website, the brand new product is similar to that of the previous product, but it seems slicker, more streamlined, a lot more contemporary, and comfortable. The famour purple leather seat is gone, replaced with a slick darker espresso coloured leather, and the dividers look slimmer and a lot more contemporary. Wooden veneer accentuates the product, mixed with other materials such as brushed metal.
BUT, God didn't want me to do another round. I didn't have peace as I was calling Doc, but I called him anyway. We had planned a trip to Colorado for the holidays, and our flight left the 20th of December. We wouldn't get back until the 31st of December. I told this info to Doc and asked if it was going to be possible to start another round before we left. He said no, because he didn't want me going in for ultrasounds in Colorado over the holidays to measure my follicles. So, we decided we'd wait until I got back and start then, and he said to call him the morning after I got back to Florida.
"Your standards are too high," I told him.
The Rebels have a bruising encounter with 3 times champions the Bulls at home this weekend and with the current injury list it will be a massive challenge.
Then we took the train to Nishi-Ogikubo in search of some cool antique store, but we never found any.
Yes, many of these people have a lot of money and accomplished every dream that they have had. Unfortunately, they do not have anyone to share those dreams with. There is nothing worse than living a dream alone. When this occurs, that dream can very easily become a sad and lonely nightmare. -Andy Pitt
The uprising of various districts seemed a natural place to take the storyline after the first book and I am glad Collins chose to give focus to it. I actually felt like the limited POV of Katniss helped in this case. It allowed us as viewers to experience the wonder of what was happening in the rebellion along with Katniss. We were only given small details throughout the book and this helped build the suspense.
In 67′ the album (#12 on Billboard) of the same name was released and got nominated for a three Grammys.
‘Okay, this is it, all the rom-coms you’ve watched must not be in vain’ I said to myself under my breath. She got closer and I decided then that I was going to talk to her, so I stood up, planted myself in her path and said
I'm looking for my pony
dressing, breakfast and errands accomplished, we were leaving town, and I see a thrift store displaying a magenta jacket with an orange tunic and bright orange scarf. Obviously, we had to stop. As I was drooling over all of the other cool things in the store, my partner LightFoot called out “Woosi Hat!” That man knows me well!
Here are the 11 questions given to me by Melissa:
Open Up Your Heart – Single
TD:
1990 – Dances with Wolves
I’ll let you know, soon as she kicks the thing.
"Anthology" is a 3 disc compilation album. It is the first album of any kind to be officially released by Quarashi since "Guerilla Disco", in 2005. The set consists of 2 CD's, and 1 DVD.
If you have me in your email contacts, or if you think you might want to share a big ole juicy secret with me at some point in the future~ please update my email address as studiojuls@gmail.com.
For the sixties fans amongst you, Side Two is perhaps even more bizarre, consisting entirely of the (by then) washed-up Scottish band The Poets singing the praises of Barr's Strike Cola to an equally funky backdrop. The Poets had one minor hit in Britain in the sixties with "Now We're Thru" and a whole bundle of rather wonderful singles out as follow-ups which (for no good reason at all) fared less well. Presumably "Fun Buggy" was an attempt at getting some cash off the good people at Barr during a somewhat difficult time, but is astonishingly atypical of their other mod-pop fare, swaggering as it does and making Strike Cola sound like the favoured beverage of choice from somebody off "Starsky and Hutch", rather than Scotland's budget-line alternative to Coca Cola which it undoubtedly was.
Knowing that some of the folks I’d met over the course of the last few days had to drive home as far away as Washington, I could hardly complain about the hundred and some miles to my house.
The key to a successful social media strategy–and that means efficiency, too, don’t forget!–is targeting your approach and achieving and maintaining a high level of interaction with your community. The speech consultant I met with today markets her services to kingpin corporate types as well as small business owners like herself. Focusing her social media strategy on those platforms that attract her target audience, then, is the wisest choice. LinkedIn is essential for her, given its highly professional nature, as is Facebook for its universality. Remember: Facebook isn’t just for kids anymore! Sixty-one percent of Facebook users are 35 years old or older. If she decided to get into video, YouTube could be a clientèle-growing goldmine. But MySpace, Hi5 and the like? These social media platforms don’t need to be on her radar because they aren’t overwhelming populated by her target audience.
The second disc includes “Lumet on Lumet,” a collection of archival interviews with the director who talks about his long career. He talks about getting into show business as a kid. He also discusses his work ethic and how he applied it to his films. Lumet also shares some of his interesting life experiences.
She originally gave it to me to look at yonks ago, when she was running on Vista - it was a present to her from someone or other, and the original drivers were long lost, and had only worked on XP anyway. I took a brief look at the time, and then went back to something more interesting (I think it was MVC1).
Grease 9 x 13 in baking pan, combine milk and yeast in a small bowl.
Soak the noodles in boiling water for a few minutes (or according to the instructions on the packet), drain in a colander and run under the cold tap to stop cooking and sticking together.
another says: ive got the smallest head of the world! last one says: I’ve
Miscellaneous: Inkadinkado Bending Chalks, Diamond Stickles, Offray ribbon, The Paper Studio gemstones
That poor chicken. He was run over. Cooked. Molested. Used as a fashion accessory.
African American history a more cohesive part of historic interpretation throughout the site. The future interpretive center, which is still in the planning phases, is a particularly great opportunity to exhibit more in-depth information and artifacts that could not only provide insight into African American history at the site, but also into the intertwined race and class labor and social systems that defined plantation life, and which still have repercussions for race and class relations in Charleston and throughout the United States today. One of the greatest contributions visitors can make in this process of change is to explore the African American history tours and interpretive spaces currently available at plantation sites such as Drayton Hall. They can then let guides and site producers know what they find to be informative and powerful about their tour experiences, and where they have questions, concerns, and suggestions for how these representations may continue to develop in the future.
settles upon the trees
at the foot of towering trees,
I have to admit that I don't have a recipe binder, but a reader asked if I could make a printable to match the others for a recipe binder. If there is one thing I love, it is making printables that meet the needs of my readers! This blog would be pretty boring without you, so passing on some love in the way of printables is the least I can do!
(2) Bananas and Oatmeal
N.B. I would just like to point out again that this post is a discussion of what we read in Divergent only. Please keep that in mind when commenting. Please don't spoil Insurgent for those who have yet to read it. Thank you.
Leonard Q Ross - or Leo Rosten - was a Polish-American Jew born near the beginning of the 20th century. I first read his three humorous books, which my parents had on their shelves, when I was in my teens. I must have re-read a couple of times while still at home, and then once again about fifteen years ago.
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. The ten-day beer celebration in the City of Brotherly Love sees hundreds of beer-themed dinners, tastings, brewery tours, pub crawls and meet-and-greets with local brewers. The festivities commence with the Hammer of Glory, which is paraded through the streets before being swung by the mayor to crack open the ceremonial first keg. (June 1 – 10)
Have you read about Percy yet?
Oh see God now
A St. Louis high school student is getting an “A” from authorities after discovering a teacher’s X-rated past.
We got more snow last night.... *sigh* ....maybe I should just have a standard post of a snowscape on my blog since nothing much is changing outside in the garden. Watching the Winter Olympics in Vancouver and reading about how mild things have been in the Northwest I'm considering packing my bags and moving out west.... (just joking Andy if you happen to be reading this.... my guy loves the Northeast!).
For Duncan's top, I used my print fabric to make a pocket in his envelope neckline tee. My pattern is from Ottobre, but you can use this tutorial to draft your own. I also colorblocked the sleeves with my print. You can use any of these methods together to personalize your item.
Now that strategy looks in danger of failing (unless Capello defies the odds in Poland & Ukraine next summer) the perception is that there should be an English manager again, but one that has a proven track record.
- followed the order of killing Filipinos in groups in order to save ammunition
Now my engagement ring did not have a matching band with it. The internet was too new to help us with that search, and husband was an aspiring artist and wanted to make me one. We didn’t like any of his clunky attempts, not to wear with my perfect ring. He kept trying, right up until the wedding week, causing me great anxiety. And then he took a simple silver wire and melted it into a loop. It was terrible. I didn’t want to seem ungrateful, but at the same time, I could not believe this was what he offered me as a symbol of his love. No time to dwell though, the wedding train was speeding ahead.
The following diagram is much of the same but has subtle differences:
1-1/2 Tbsp. finely grated orange zest
If you would like to contact us then please call 01732 760699 or email sales@thecarspy.net
Abraham, Brad. 2011. “Dave Grohl and other Exciting Tales of Pit Justice”. Accessed March 29, 2012. http://www.themarshalltown.com/zine/2011/07/15/dave-grohl-and-other-exciting-tales-of-pit-justice-3/
Christmas Jingle Simply Scrappin' Kit
Don't let a label define you. The unschooling label can be freeing...or it can be binding. Instead of embracing a label, embrace the way you and others want to feel - joyful, connected, adventurous? Focus on those things and let freedom, trust and compassion be your cornerstones.
Teddy Walters (guitar)
I see your face, it's haunting me
#3. An afternoon with Ani in the immense and inspirational M&L Fabric store, while Brian and Larry stand by fiddling with their iPhones. After a whole lot of fabric inspection we found a perfect stack of bolts to piece together a new quilt for Ani and Brian’s house (by that time Larry and Brian were in the donut shop across the way).
Place the stock in a saucepan and bring to a simmer over medium heat
On top of that my cousin and her husband came to visit Ankara. They were in Germany and decided to pop over. It was a blast. We had foodapalooza, hit up kebab houses, bakeries and cafes. We literally stuffed our faces, and it was great. From Ankara they are touring Istanbul and sound like they are having a great time.
Bruschetta – Great bruschetta – ciabatta with tomatoes and shaved parm.
As she struggles to uncover who her family has really been running from, she is forced to hide her birthmark that reveals who she is. With new realities surfacing, unexplained powers appearing, and two tempting boys vying for her heart, Jewel battles to learn who she can trust in an ever growing sea of lies, hoping she’ll make it through her seventeenth birthday alive.
This is just one dark corner of the Karaite world that Kahana helped expose. But he was not alone in this enterprise. Ofra Tirosh-Becker, a linguist by training, has been working on one aspect of this Karaite material for many years. Her doctoral dissertation – under the same name – was approved in 2000. In it, she discusses as many quotations of rabbinic works in Karaite literature as she could find.
The Paddy McKillen case is set to wrap up over the next day or two with a judgment expected in June 2011.
Over and over in the Bible, we see the phrases, “Fear God,” “Fear the LORD,” “Fear the Lord,” and “Fear Him.” Most occurrences of these phrases come from words that mean to revere, give reverence to. This is the phrase we are looking at here. My goal is for us to obtain a better understanding of what it means to fear (revere) the Lord, what it causes me to do, what areas in my life are affected by it, and what fearing the Lord will bring into my life.
What, then, of the theory about the people's war? Numerous submissions to the TRC had detailed the role in violence of the 'armed struggle', especially after it had evolved (in the 1980s) into what the ANC termed a 'people's war'. The people's war explicitly targeted not only policemen and soldiers, but also local councillors, 'collaborators', 'informers', and all 'puppets and agents of the regime'. The aim of the people's war was to render South Africa 'ungovernable' and ultimately overthrow all authority. But because it relied on the masses to mount an insurrection-rather than on trained guerrillas to fight the police and army-the violence it generated spiralled out of control. And because it targeted so many in the black community, it also provoked a violent backlash from some at least. Once the retaliation began, moreover, it developed its own momentum and, among other consequences, evolved into a civil war between the ANC and the IFP that spread in time from Natal and KwaZulu to the Reef.
PRYING eyes of science are probing into space again in the hope of detecting life on other planets. Armed with new facts, previously accepted theories about what lies beyond the Earth are being discarded by scientists every day and the possibility grows more and more distinct that creatures, more fantastic than our most vivid imaginations could conjure up, may inhabit the planets around us. They make those startling stories of weird little men in flying saucers seem tame by comparison.
Luis Jimenez, 25, New York, N.Y.
Wheat beers should be drunk with the yeast in. I find this adds a richness to the feel of the beer and gives it a thicker, more velvety texture. When served from a bottle in Germany, the beer will be poured almost completely into the glass before the last few drops are swirled around the bottom of the bottle to pick up as much of the sediment as possible, this is then thrown in too. When pouring, it’s also important to be quite aggressive, you want to create a big pillow of head to sit on top of the beer.
The half moon
The Sippy Straw Cleaner works great on other things too, like thermos straws, sports bottles, regular drinking straws and my husband has threatened to steal them for cleaning auto parts & whatever else he plays with out there in the garage.
Lost he his other eye?
for the record: We got an amazing piece in chorale to perform in a month or two for something or another. It's an MGM medley and has stuff like "Singin' in the Rain", "Good Mornin'", "Make 'em Laugh", and "Over the Rainbow".
We met on an uncharacteristically warm day in early October for dinner at an Indian restaurant. He was quirky, witty, and cute…totally my type. We had a delightful, insightful conversation over Chicken Shawarma, rice, vegetables, and wine. I laughed, he laughed, we asked questions of each other, we listened to one another. He told me I was beautiful. He told me he wasn’t looking for perfection. I was relieved. He was saying all the right things. I got more comfortable as the night went on. We finished dinner. What to do now?
You shouldn't come around here singing up to people like that...
Him: "What? I don't know." And he continues to pull off the long underwear.
“Why my uncle Arlok Iron-Whiskers once stopped a sharp saber from slicing off his head with his beard!” exclaimed Arik with relish to the barmaid and the waiter who laughed at his wiggling eyebrows as much as at the story. The owner had come out and after a brief negotiation over tab that was settled amiably, the group ascended the stairway and held a conversation in Rothmon's study. Hermel expressed his misgivings regarding going down into the sewer and dungeon, now that he was given to understand by Bernie the nature of the threat he faced in Hobbington from now on. In fact he was quite inclined to head off sooner rather than later to the village and see what they could do down there about the bandits. He offered to Mr. Stouthart another plan.
Whatever else may be in this legislation is totally irrelevant, the first to file rule completely destroys any protections for actual creators. What would I, as a small independent inventor, have as motivation to invent something when I would need outside funding to patent my idea, and could very conceivably get legally screwed because someone else stole it and filed the application before me? If I have no protections at all prior to paying Uncle Sam for them, my and every other inventor’s efforts become meaningless.
Anyways so while I wait to post that thought I would share how the new years resolution have been going. This last Monday and Tuesday we worked on the storage are in the attic. We re-decked the storage area. Since we still had all the decorations down we thought better do it now while we can. Don't like to use the attic as storage but for things like holiday decorations I guess its okay. We also have started to add insulation over the garage.
For my first card I used a Marian Emberson stamp, stamped in VersafineOnyx, Gems added to the flower heads. Then sentiment is Pink Petticoat
Maybe more!!!
The new Abby Abernathy is a good girl. She doesn't drink or swear, and she has the appropriate percentage of cardigans in her wardrobe. Abby believes she has enough distance between her and the darkness of her past, but when she arrives at college with her best friend America, her path to a new beginning is quickly challenged by Eastern University's Walking One-Night Stand.
I think Ella would get on well with Sue Grafton's Kinsey Millhone. I can picture them putting their feet up and having a good yak!
This is my first ever Frock on Friday post. Though I have, in the spirit of the challenge, been making more effort to wear a dress on Fridays, I've never had the time to take a photo or blog about it until today. After the coldest, wettest summer in twenty years the UK has been enjoying unseasonably warm weather this week and I've actually worn a dress every day of this week to take advantage of the last days of a surprise Indian summer.
Medical treatments know no bounds - the Animal Medical Center of New York City is world-renowned. This veterinary hospital provides routine and emergency medical care for pets and also offers treatment for animals suffering from complicated diseases. The staff, which includes more than 90 veterinarians, utilizes an interdisciplinary team approach and combines expertise in 17 different specialties. The facility is open 24 hours a day, 365 days a year.
The Eurocommunism of the 1960s and 1970s found no echo within the SACP, and none of the great intellectual controversies of European Marxism seemed of any interest to the decidedly unintellectual SACP. Quite how insulated from reality the SACP had been became evident only in the 1990s when Slovo talked of how shaken he and his comrades had been by Gorbachev's recent revelations about the Gulag. Yet this was fantastical. First word of the Gulag had seeped out of the USSR in the late 1930s. In the early post-war world there had been a major controversy over the Gulag in the pages of Sartre's Les Temps Modernes in the late 1940s.
But where can I go
1) Conan The Barbarian Soundtrack
'water on the brain' scare
These girls love s'mores! Good thing a random family gave us a bag of their marshmallows, graham crackers & chocolate because the S'mores stand was already closed! Thank you random family!
13. Rude World (Rough Mix 2 Page / Plant)
-Jacqueline
First things first: The downtown road construction traffic nightmares of last year are largely gone. However, RAIL transit (Metro and Light Rail) use for downtown events, especially at the Pratt Street Ale House, is strongly encouraged whenever possible.
Hell, we should grant them defacto citizenship on request and proof of ancestry.
Let us fix our eyes on Jesus, the author and perfecter of our faith, who for the joy set before him endured the cross, scorning its shame, and sat down at the right hand of the throne of God.
I called the local hotel we use for emergencies like this and booked a room. I told them I would arrive between 8:30-9:00. When I went out to the car around 7:15 to go in search of dinner, it was bad. Really bad. I about fell twice just in the parking lot. I went back in, got my stuff and decided to go straight to the hotel after dinner.
In addition to the foregoing General Objections, Plaintiff objects to Interrogatory No. 6 on the grounds that it is vague, ambiguous, overbroad, unduly burdensome, and calls for information that is not relevant to the claim or defense of any party.
Anders Behring Breivik may have seen what we see, he may have cried for his homeland as we cry and he may have identified the same cause and the same guilty men as we have. Yet when he embarked on his evil work he became their creature, a creature of the left. The left may not want him, but when he chose their path he became one of theirs, he is not one of ours.
If you choose to eat animal products - and I am going to include milk in this because, believe me, there is nothing natural about cows being milked twice a day for years on end, nothing at all - it is your responsibility to eat ethically, especially if you are then going to lecture others on what they choose to eat.
That you do so well
WAITER: And how was your meal, ma’am?
"I now understand why Stan always smiles when I take his picture--he is smiling because he is a narcissist and planning on using these pictures to take over the world." Stan's mother said.
And it still exists today. Although many modern-day US Democrats often seem to be anti-American, the situation is rather different in Australia and Britain. Both the major Leftist parties there (the Australian Labor Party and the British Labour Party) are perfectly patriotic parties which express pride in their national traditions and achievements. Nobody seems to have convinced them that you cannot be both Leftist and nationalist. That is of course not remotely to claim that either of the parties concerned is a Nazi or an explicitly Fascist party. What Hitler and Mussolini advocated and practiced was clearly more extremely nationalist than any major Anglo-Saxon political party would now advocate.
wrists nudge the wheel, fingers quick
Go to http://lists.psu.edu/archives/deos-l.htmlto change your subscription settings and to search the DEOS-L archivesDEOS-L is a service provided to the Distance Education community by the Adult Education Program, College of Education, The Pennsylvania State University. Opinions expressed are those of DEOS-L subscribers, and do not constitute endorsement of any opinion, product, or service by The Pennsylvania State University.
3) What kind of educational opportunities would you like to see for adults with disabilities? For their families? For those who support them?
Putting the most stunning images on your website will likely do very little for attracting visitors.
Canon G7 VS the Canon G6. The Canon G7 has brought new features to the Canon Powershot series and is taking the place of the Canon Powershot G7. I have listed the new features along with a side by side comparison of the Canon G7 and the Canon G6
1/2 cup thinly sliced green onions (I didn't have these and it tasted just fine)
“Wow!”, I said. “A shark shaped hole! Weird. And are you expecting an explanation for this weird occurrence?”
What's your favorite lounging attire?
I have been having a play with a few of the goodies I bought at the Make it Craft Show in Farnborough last week. For this card I used an Impression Obsession stamp set which included the butterflies and the damsel fly, (which is fact hiding behind the ribbon), I managed to purchase it for the princely sum of £3.50 in a reduced bin, the Memory Box poppy die (isn't it gorgeous) and the tag die which is from a Papermania set. In reality the ribbon is a really close match to the kraft card, but the lighting has done a little something to alter it.
Everything is sold AS IS, with NO guarantees
Good morning! How about starting this weekend with a party? For me, and so many Peachy Keen fans like me, that would be a party of blog hopping! Our Peachy Keen designers and friends have been busy, busy, busy creating cute cards and projects with their new Peachy Keen Kut Out dies and stamps, and we're ready to share, so let's get the party started!! If you arrived here from the wonderful and talented Viv's Blog, then you are hopping along in just the right order, but if you just happened along, then you've just got to go back to the beginning at The Peachy Keen Stamps Blog and start from there, so you don't miss one fabulous creation, OR a chance to win a terrific prize, and yes THERE WILL BE PRIZES!!
IMPALA PLATINUM MINES: Striking black mineworkers drag white woman from her car and rape her.
GM = General Mills insert (usually a Smartsource insert)
Good.
MARCH 12, 1922
Don’t get me wrong, I actually find Moffat’s positive endings refreshing over Davies’ guilt-ridden-emo-wallowing season finales. And that, my friends, is one of the many things that brings me back each season. Matt Smith is my favorite Doctor, River Song is a mysterious and intriguing addition, and I love that Moffat’s seasons always end on a happy, uplifting, and anticipatory note. Sounds like I’m seriously contradicting myself doesn’t it? Watch it, then you’ll know why I’m so torn. What it comes down to is this: Moffat, I love what you’re doing! But you gotta pull your crap together or you’re gonna lose it.
24. Why aren’t there any books with the opening sentence, "It was a bright and calm morning?"
Raleigh, NC 27616
As soon as Google+ went live, Google employees were given “verified” status and many were promoted as featured users, allowing them to build large followings. Google built the Google+ platform, then gave themselves home court advantage.
After confusing the issue beyond belief, I come back to the original question that motivated this post. Can you fake real? If so, does fake become real or does real become fake?
“It’s natural to want to be better. To want to improve something, fix your flaws, to challenge yourself to become a better you. As we do these things, it’s easy to raise our expectations to the point that we lose sight of our self-acceptance. When our ambition cancels out our self-love, it removes our enjoyment of life. For today, perhaps challenge yourself to recognize your efforts. Imagine that you are exactly who and where you ought to be. Be gentle with yourself today.”
Schalk, Peter 2003 “Beyond Hindu Festivals: The Celebration of Great Heroes’ Day by the Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam (LTTE) in Europe,” in Martin Baumann et al. (eds.) Tempel und Tamilien in Zweiter Heimat, Wurzburg: Ergon Verlag, pp. 391-411.
I hope you have been to Everyday Cricut to check out Monique's project and another new kit... If not you have to click HERE. She also has some great blog candy...
Grandma parked down the street from Bobby's house, and she and I crept noiselessly and hid in the bushes by his front walk. Then Grandma gave me a nudge. "All right, Santa Claus," she whispered, "get going." I took a deep breath, dashed for his front door, threw the present down on his step, pounded his doorbell and flew back to the safety of the bushes and Grandma. Together we waited breathlessly in the darkness for the front door to open. Finally it did, and there stood Bobby.
"Mama, what's for supper?" youngest DS
~Bill Stout
Robyn's Fetish Digital Stamps And More is proud to sponsor this challenge.
It is easy for those of us watching the Godfather series on DVD to forget that Part III was released almost two decades after the phenomenally successful Parts I & II (in 1990). Apart from Hollywoood’s usual goal of wringing every last cent from a successful film franchise, the third film intends to be both a celebration of the earlier films and a wrap up of the life of ‘the Godfather’, Michael Corleone. It is generally considered to be the poor cousin of its predecessors and, indeed, it lacks something of their originality, complexity and compelling tension. It also falls short in terms of the depth of the caste. Gone are Brando and DeNiro (with Vito Corleone dead) and Robert Duval’s Tom Hagin is replaced with a forgetable lawyer. All that is left of the original is Pacino and Keaton, who are both excellent, but whose relationship is difficult to fathom. Apart from Andy Garcia, who plays Sonny’s son Vincent (the next generation Godfather), the remainder of the supporting caste are relatively bland, and the movie focuses almost exclusively on the Pacino’s Michael. This is not to say that it is a bad film. Apart from the fact that anyone who has seen Parts I & II will be compelled to see the story through to its conclusion, it remains a well scripted character study, and one that takes us thematically forward; moving beyond analysis of the ambiguity of evil to a reflection on the possibility of redemption.
It was difficult to empathise with the heroine’s self-indulgent sulking over the loss of her vapid, humourless ham. Bella Swan, who bears the sloppiest, clichéd name ever to smear the pages of fiction, is completely devoid of wit or charm. Actress Kristen Stewart saves her from being utterly loathsome on screen, but it’s not enough to make her interesting. Is this really a character 21st Century women relate to?
should edit the movie to take that part out
So without further adieu, My Super Important, Crucial, Not-An-Option, list of things you should know about me :
And one of the many things we agree on is the gradual progress. One of the many reasons I send all my Atlantic Canada clients to him is that he wants the same thing as me: to enhance the joy of running!
Part of submitting to things is accepting rejection. I never would have had a chance at the Paper Craft Idol contest if I wouldn't have submitted....right? So....here is my "reject" although I personally love this cheery card.
The visit will be re-arranged when I eventually sort myself out.
Generally I want to make them listen to my profound wisdom and to guide them into some kind of mysterious light. Often, I am full of shit. But at the time, I think that I make Gandhi look shallow. Also at the time, I would absolutely not label myself as judgmental, just as a loving friend who wants the best for her fellow home girl. As I said, I am full of shit.
The 8th Annual edition of Max's Belgian Beer Festival
On the subject of plugging ones own work, I came across a great quote, which all writers need to bear in mind, no matter how much they resist the notion. I've written an article for the Spring issue of The Stinging Fly on this issue called 'The Writer and the Internet'. Coming soon!
08/06/2010 SELL 0.01 xauusd 1203.05 08/09/2010 1200.04 +3.01
The wind,
Now, I am not going to do this exactly as Mrs. Child directs (I can't leave well enough alone). I'm not using isinglass (a kind of gelatin) for one thing. I'm also not using strained strawberry juice; I'm going to mash the strawberries with the sugar, and fold them into the whipped cream. Then I'm going to line a baking dish with plastic wrap, pour the mixture in, and just freeze it. I also inherited some fancy Jello-molds from my grandma so I may line some of them with plastic and make little molded ice creams for fun!
That’s about to change, in the wake of an unprecedented decline in Mexican immigration and a new influx of Chinese immigrant workers who will be fleeing hopeless conditions in China; many of them will enter the US undocumented. …
02. You Didn't Try To Call Me
Kenneth Lillard
To get away
It's a terrible admission for one of my intense musical credibility to make but it's actually starting to grow on me. This is mostly because - God bless him - Brendon's doing everything he can to sell it to us.
Lord, break the hardness of our hearts, and lead us also to the place where “You are our Lover from the start and the highway to your City runs through my heart.”
* 6 song acoustic set
But where does the "everlasting fire" come in? To see that we have to note that Jesus was speaking figuratively for most of the passage, as he often did. His parables are famous. So is he really going to sit on a throne and muster billions of people on either side of him? If so, he would need to locate himself somewhere around Iran and even then the billions of goats would be crowded for room and many could well fall into the Mediterranean (presuming the throne was facing North).
by Kate DiCamillo
I cannot think of any…
Now here we are, Tuesday morning. I’m getting hungry and I’m ready to get started putting together a flavor that is brand new to me.
Whether her fault or not, Hillary seems to embody most of Bill Clinton's negatives without the benefit of his positives. This is almost insurmountable. It will be so easy for any opponent to remind potential voters of her image, and this could even happen as early as the Democratic primaries. Individual voters don't have to dislike her personally to believe that they'd be backing a loser to support her, and that's why Hillary has an almost impossible task ahead of her in trying to land the swing voters. She may have a chance to win the Democratic nomination, but she is unlectable as president unless the Republicans put up a candidate so repugnant that the voters have to hold their nose and vote for her. Hey...it's how she won the Senate in 2000, so it's not impossible. Ultimately, though, if she is the Democratic nominee the GOP has to trip over their own genitalia to lose.
“They have tried every finger and thumb, but I don’t know why that machine does not accept any of them. I have done everything that the officers and the machine babu have told me to: scrubbed my hands with soap and water, even applied mustard oil,” says a tearful Mano Devi. The machine babu is the banking correspondent (BC), Rajesh Kumar, appointed by the Bank of India. So every day she has returned empty handed to her home about two km away, let down by the sophisticated technology that was supposed to relieve her of the tedium of going to the nearest branch bank to collect her wages, and losing a working day in the process. The problem for Mano Devi is her fingerprints. Her hands are calloused. Touch her fingers and you can feel the cuts, the hardened skin which is the result of the tough work she is engaged in: breaking stones, picking up heavy material, ploughing and, of course, working in the kitchen.
Brian Joseph Cachia, 26, New York, N.Y.
District 4 Legislator Shelby Visintin
...we can finally say it feels like winter. The white stuff has arrived and the temperatures also correspond with winter weather. A large snowman sits in the yard, sporting an army helmet and sword...attesting to the fact that winter may have been late but it's now here.
You may recall (or may not, if you haven't been reading - shame on you) in the seventh chapter that there are plans afoot to formulate a master plan in order to get rid of our anti-curved anti-hero once and for all.
Light Soya Sauce, 1 table spoon
Today I took my own advise. I relaxed.
Kathy Wittlock
"Almost," I said.
He even furnished the investigating priest and his colleagues with their names and addresses.
Supramental Psychiquazim is the real time-self of the sun and the stars
NtH
First he picks up the kids who did good
The next day when my mom called to tell me that my dad (who still thinks he is Indiana Jones even though he is now 73 years old) had fallen while trimming the branches high in a tree in our back yard, and had broken his hip and a disc in his back, I worried, and prayed, and cried.
91. I will tell you in a few words who I am: lover of the hummingbird that darts to the flower beyond the rotted sill where my feet are propped; lover of bright needlepoint and the bright stitching fingers of humorless old ladies bent to their sweet and infamous designs; lover of parasols made from the same puffy stuff as a young girl's underdrawers; still lover of that small naval boat which somehow survived the distressing years of my life between her decks or in her pilothouse; and also lover of poor dear black Sonny, my mess boy, fellow victim and confidant, and of my wife and child. But most of all, lover of my harmless and sanguine self. —John Hawkes, Second Skin (1964)
So now I can rest and relax on the weekends at least for a while. I better take advantage of that down time because not too far down the road it will start all over again! :) Thank goodness it just keeps coming at me! SRM Stickers is now 32 years old! Maybe it's time we gave a birthday party and made birthday tubes and wands to celebrate! :)
Options: The sequence is certainly quick, but you will see people acting (perhaps reacting), but then they stop for a few seconds, reassess the situation, and then take action again — and again.
What do you make? Any tips or favorite family recipes?
*She also keeps you distracted in all kinds of inventive ways while the actual tattooing is going on, including a soft shoe routine that I can’t possibly describe.
By far the most visually impressive title on the system to date, Revelations shows off 3DS’s capabilities like no other game on the market, and you’ll definitely want to crank up the 3D as far as you can (if only to put some much-needed distance between you and the hoards of hulking great monsters hungry for a chunk of Jill sandwich). Complete with StreetPass functionality and an excellent online co-op mode, Revelations is here to show other 3DS games how to deliver an outstanding handheld performance.
It has reminded me that things can change quickly. For all the athletes here we are on edge and some may feel this more than others. Back in 2000 I missed out and was ruled out of selection. I appreciate what it's like to miss out on your dream. I understand the feelings of disappear if and when the time comes and the reality of all the hard work, the motivation, aspiration comes crashing down. The week and next our rowers are being tested to find the best combinations. Tested to find the best performers. Tested to hopefully pick the best people for the best boats now and for in London. Have been and having missed I know in part both sides of the score.
So it was a lazy night last night, and I decided to stay in and watch a movie. It was really difficult to find a movie that fit the funky mood I was in. Eventually I settled on a gem called "The Hangover." (Oddly appropriate considering my Friday night activities.) That movie will never stop being funny to me, mainly because I see a lot of me and my friends in it. And it appeals to my inner tribal-being. His name is Sasquatch Minnetonka. That loosely translates to hairy, big-footed, culturally-unlearned one. He tall. He strong. He look like always wear sweater. He dance long time to Iko Iko.
I teach, but never studied educational pedagogy. The visit offered many lessons: “The Master said, Not until he is eager to know, but feels difficulty, do I instruct; not until he wants to speak out, but fails to express himself, do I enlighten. If I present him one corner and he cannot from it infer the other three, I do not continue the lesson.”
I'm glad that the shower is over though. I totally hate being the center of attention and hosting it at my house was stressful but it turned out perfectly. Everyone loved seeing his room and a lot of my family has never been to my house so they were all happy to see my house too.
In no particular order, it went like this
While we were waiting for him, the nice mom who let me borrow her phone got my basket together and offered some advice. She told me there was a walk-in clinic not far from the park. She said her five kids had required stitching up from time to time, and they were nice there. So I borrowed yet another phone, from a friend this time, and headed out.
So let's sneak back in time.....
Offenses: 05/17/1998 AGGRAVATED RAPE, 03/29/1998 AGGRAVATED RAPE, 11/22/1997 AGGRAVATED RAPE
Time: 2009-09-30 10:16:10.4 UTC
After pressing our noses up against the window, I give into the Oriental Love, a giant coconut macaron with passionfruit curd, pandan cream, caramelised banana and peanut brittle. The stumps of banana are a long lost delight.
I really have been puked at a lot (that last paragraph got away from me a little…). When I brought Fiona home from the hospital, it didn’t feel real. I kept feeling a little like I’d escaped with a child and any minute the proper authorities would pound down my door and demand her back. It might be part of why I was so resistant to letting anyone hold her. What can I say? I have issues.
So, THANK YOU, to Rick and crew… You did a wonderful job and couldn’t be more thrilled with how beautiful it turned out!
In my opinion the current legislation is perfectly adequate when dealing with cases involving so called ‘legal highs’ and all other types of ‘drug driving’ cases. Some may argue that the current ‘Field Impairment Test’ (FIT) is too onerous to administer, which is the real reason why the number of arrests for drug driving is relatively low in comparison to the number of arrests for drink driving.
Folding Chair Folds
According to research, humans innately prefer consonance over dissonance, with dissonance possibly causing a slight “pain” in the ear as the two tones vibrate either too closely together or out of phase. (see research of Sacks, Levitin, Fink, Kagan, and Zentner; AMAZING STUFF). Some of these studies were done on infants, which means I don’t have to add that to my list of curiosities; we innately DO prefer consonance.
Herb was printed on X-Press It Blending card, then coloured with copics. After cutting him out, he was mounted on a circle cut out with my nestabilities.
If you've never been to the Israel21C website, you're missing an incredible resource for the amazing and innovative things Israel has created and continues to bring to the world. But since this is about blogs, did you know they also have a blog? If you have a second, please check out this post - and Israel in 180 seconds - it's just stunning: Foto Friday - Time Lapse in Israel.
Many people on the left have sought to blame the riots on cuts, EMA and tuition fees. They are wrong, as can be clearly seen by the type of people going before the courts.
The liner is black but leans more on the gray side, hence the name granite ink.
Arnie also talks, addressing the user by name recognized when the key fob swipe is made. Arnie's touchscreen also handles Twitter communication -- Arnie can tweet you -- and data such as how much beer was consumed each day of the week.
13. Raps 4 U (prod Harlem Fatz)
186th place: North Korea
The verses concerning Jihad were revealed as general and absolute without limitation. Accordingly an evidence from Shari’ah is required to limit these verses concerning Jihad. However there are no evidences from Qur’an or Sunnah that place limitations on Jihad. Thus, Jihad encompasses all of the aforementioned types of war.
Today is a two for one with nail polish colors! I love this China Glaze collection so much! I keep wanting to change my mani just so I can try them all out quicker.
Of the Deity’s crimson lifelines;
or am I alive
Kit includes 8 sets of class notes, photos, all the goodies required to make these awesome 8 double layouts, lunch, tea and sweet treats - the cost is R1650-00. A R600-00 deposit will secure your spot for either of the days!
Get up, drink some water and check Twitter. I may have to ditch the Twitter part, as much as I enjoy catching up with the world, it gives Lazy Chris an opportunity to try and lure me to stay in bed, reading various news stories and the fact I follow a couple of pornstars means that LC gets to appeal to my baser instincts.
I guess to be honest the biggest thing I'm enjoying about all of this is that there really is a huge relief off my shoulders. I send the book to them, give them notes, answer questions, and they take care of everything else. I just get to sit in my house and watch reruns of Frasier while they make my book awesome.
They're kicking off with the chart run-down but I'm refusing to watch it, so it doesn't spoil the surprise of what's number 1. It's probably Adele or One Direction or The Wanted like it usually is.
However, my next question is, “What am I stopping?” Does pushing this button stop the gas? the electricity? the phone? the water? a horde of stampeding capybaras?
Kyo Kara Maoh! follows Yuri and his entourage as he makes a difference in the lives of those he touches and the towns they live in. Mostly filled with comedic mishaps and misunderstandings, there are some very serious, sad, and touching moments perfectly interwoven within the story as well.
“We view it as a very exciting opportunity for the show. We remain hugely committed to the brand of Doctor Who in all its forms, and we have a wonderful new team in place who are very excited about taking the show on new adventures.”
How sugary sweet love kisses, would taste on my lips,
Monday is Halloween... This year I decided to spice it up a little and do a Halloween breakfast instead of a candy exchange/cupcake kinda party like usual. Students signed up to bring in a tasty breakfast item for our Halloween breakfast. It's too late now with Halloween on Monday, but if you would like to file this idea away for next year, you can get the note by clicking on the picture below!
IMPORTANT: don't forget to indicate the number of heads I will need to pain and also your nick/name if you are posting as and anonymous user.
Pull the pot off the heat and whisk in all the baking soda, so it froths up. Then put the pot right in the fridge to cool down a little.
Not that I didn’t get to do things that I like to do in this class, I did. I don’t usually have a forum where I can justify the time I waste doing my little paint-creations. Some people got to see them, some people liked them… that’s enough for me. Maybe I’ll continue them on this blog? I can’t make promises. Promises are like homework assignments—they stress me out, because they’re required. I don’t have enough Lollypam in my arsenal to go about willy-nilly, making promises I don’t know if I intend to keep. Oh well.
I will start off by saying Happy “Mother’s” Day to you, but this will be the last time you get this acknowledgement from me. I no longer want anything to do with you nor do I want your lame attempts at being a grandmother to my children. They deserve better, as do I. I am tired of giving you the benefit of the doubt and waiting for your “teenage” years to pass. I realize that you lost a lot of that because you were busy supposedly being a “mother.” Well I have waited over 18 years for you to get out of this phase and I am done waiting for you to grow up and be the mother/grandmother that I was so hoping you could be. I gave up my “teenage” years to raise your sons. While you were out drinking and partying it up I was at home tending to 3 young boys instead of going out and enjoying my childhood. I should have been attending football games and school dances and having sleep overs with friends, but I couldn’t because I was too busy trying to keep our family together while you went out to have your fun because I knew that you had been tied down and not allowed to do anything after getting pregnant with me and then marrying dad. I thought it would last a year or two max, boy was I wrong. This is not to say that a mother should never go out and enjoy herself occasionally because I know that it is important to my sanity to get out every once in awhile with other adults to just have a good time. But, after that fun is all said and done, I come home to my children and back into my role as a mother to them. I was in the same situation that you were in at 16 years old but yet I have managed to be a responsible, loving, attentive mother to my children. I did go out and have fun after I left Ricky in a lame attempt to rebuild our relationship, little did I know that it wouldn’t work. I was so desperate to have a relationship with you, but I was not going to sacrifice my children for it. Our relationship just wasn’t, and isn’t, that important to me. I do not feel that you were EVER there for me. I mean you basically kicked me out after I got pregnant and then as I was giving birth as a newly 17 year old you were “out of town” with John, knowing full well that I was within days of my due date. You don’t think at a time like that having MY own mother there would have been nice? Thankfully Ricky’s mother stepped up to the plate with that. It’s pretty sad that she was more of a mother to me than my own mother and more of a grandmother to Kyley and Dawson than you ever were. For the 1st five years of Dawson’s life he didn’t think that I had a mother and he thought that you were “aunt.” What does that say about you? Not much that’s for sure.
Media manipulation of the facts:
New England and Maine explorations can be done from the deck of your own charter yacht. There is plenty to see if you are chartering a yacht for a week or more. The glacier carved harbors, historical towns and the sea itself are there for you to lap up. From the glorious beaches of The Hamptons to the rugged coastline of Maine this is one trip you will never forget. You can explore the uniqueness of Martha’s Vineyard with your own your own yacht charter. History enthusiasts will love a yacht charter based around Boston and Cape Cod or if you want to ‘people watch’, your charter yacht can stop at Sag Harbour or Shelter Island. And yes, if you want to sail under the Brooklyn Bridge and pass by the Statue of Liberty on your own charter yacht you can.
Well I kept seeing this lovely freebie all over the place so I could not resist on colouring her up too all for spring no valentine card here lol her hair took a while to color I wanted it shades of grey and she's colored with Touch Markers then gone over top with pencil crayons then softened with a blending marker (one that has it's colour faded but works ) I've even did her shoes and stockings blue but thought way to much so slowly built up warm grey tones over top to give her a darker shoe her hair seems so much darker when I look at her in real life
2 tbls. melted butter
3. add one yolk at a time until mixed, add vanilla
I'm off to link her up now so ttfn ...see ya asap.
1 EXTRA large bag sour skittles (1 lb. or higher)
Here she is all finished up!
16th July – Sinnet, Göteborg
This post is the third installment of A Complete Idiot's Guide to 2012 where I read a different self-help guide every month. Special thanks to them for providing me the books.
Charlotte leapt into action and was soon on hand to, well, lend a hand. She was quick to laugh and point out that there was something on the wall next to me… yes… you guessed it… more poo.
In my recent speech in Iowa, some eyebrows were raised when I took on our government’s enormous economic problems caused by crony capitalism. As if on cue, just days later President Obama selected someone who exemplifies a major crony capitalism problem to sit next to the First Lady when he delivered his “jobs plan” speech before Congress. He selected General Electric CEO Jeffrey Immelt as his honored guest.
The author’s use of imagery is at times stunning. “I heard the train whistle. I saw myself as a bird following the train as it wound its way through the landscape, leaving only smoke as evidence that it had passed.” Referring to her aunt, Lily thinks about “Tulips closed as tightly as Aunt Hester’s lips.”
4 teams in Tulsa, Oklahoma City, Des Moines and Northwest Arkansas .
~ Bill Hicks
In 1994, the new North Terminal International Departures Lounge and the first phase of the new South Terminal International Departures Lounge opened. The investment for both lounges was £30 million.
Smiler also brought 3 guests on during the night, one by name of Sam Roman, the hilarious Bigz who threw some amazing faces and weird gestures which I was loving and also a female singer called Amy and I can’t for the life of me remember her sur name but she had a great voice.
Mix your sugar, salt, and corn syrup together with 3/4 cup cold water and bring to a boil. The recipe says to boil it without stirring until your thermometer reaches 238 degrees, or about 9 minutes. My thermometer goes from 200 - 250 degrees, so judging 238 was a bit difficult. In the end, I decided to just boil it for 9 minutes and move on.
"Wait a second, that olestra crap made people shit themselves, right? That stuff was horrible!" I say.
The pecans I tossed with a tiny bit of walnut oil and sprinkled with ground clove, salt, and black pepper. I then toasted the pecans for about six minutes in 350° oven. The rest of the salad is green leaf lettuce, Belgian endive, arugula, iceberg lettuce, fresh shaved asparagus*, naval orange segments, fresh cilantro leaves, and chive batons. And I sprinkled a wee bit of fleur de del over the salad after I plated it.
Once the clock strikes 7am, the amazing savings will be over, but the savings themselves won’t be quite gone: you’ll be able to get 10% off everything* until close of business at 9pm.
There are accounts of how knowledge has and can be gained. If you look at the idea of electricity you would find that it has always been in existence, however it has only been in recent history that it was discovered and used. But the fact is that electricity has always been in existence. So from this example we can also see that there are many things that have been discovered which have always been in existence. This could lead to the idea that Knowledge and Principles of the Universe may have well been in existence since the beginning of time.
I’ve learned over time that the one thing I can be sure of is that challenges are right around the corner from good times. We face little and big challenges every day in our work. As a leader do you sometimes feel like you’re standing in front of a baseball pitching machine? You hit one ball and have to immediately get ready to face the next one flying your way. On some days do you feel like you’re inside that screen saver with the stars coming at you? In a leadership role, there are moments when it feels like we’re standing at the edge of a steep cliff, and stepping off each time we deal with problems. We can use our best judgment and hope that our organizations have a strong safety net below us to support us if we fall. As long as we’re not negligent, that safety net is important. It allows us to weigh multiple aspects of problems and make decisions without second-guessing ourselves.
One of the strengths of the Hapthorn novels is their even-handedness; the reader appreciates how Henghis feels, as a Sherlock who can no longer eliminate the impossible, but also shares the excitement of his intuitive alter ego regarding the age of magic to come. Would you secretly side with one of them? In which of the two ages would you prefer to live?
I discovered that this rifle hits about ten to twelve inches high at 100 yards, otherwise it's dead on for windage. A solid hold on the center of the lower paper plate put a nice hit in the center of the plate above it almost every time, and the grouping was pretty tight. I experimented with different holds, and a six o'clock hold just below the edge of a plate will put one in the upper half of that plate every time. it's not perfect, but then there weren't point-of-aim match rifles. next time out, I'll see what it does at 200 yards. I didn't have enough time today as I had a lunch date waiting.
The boy in my dream was my nephew. He is 13. At the beginning of the summer of this year, he was diagnosed with a very rare disease called Stargardt’s Disease. It is an inherited juvenile macular degeneration. Since his diagnosis in May, he has lost almost all of his central vision. When he was diagnosed, my husband and I did some research to find out what the disease was, what caused it, and what advances had been made. There’s not much to know. The problem is, there isn’t much money to fund the research on such a rare disease.
I have claimed this patch of woods as my own. I have now
MD has almost been banned from Friday night quiz. As if her English wasn't good enough, she can also answer in another - somewhat exotic - European language (not sure if you'd like me to give away what this language is MD- is that getting too personal?). Then she could probably tell you the country of origin of where that question came from, and the history of any related fact...anyway - MD just has a way with words.
Nikki longs to spend these months reconnecting with her boyfriend, Jack, the one person she loves more than anything. But there's a problem: Cole, the smoldering immortal who first enticed her to the Everneath, has followed Nikki to the mortal world. And he'll do whatever it takes to bring her back- this time as his queen.
And with extra-soft quilted slip covers, you can enjoy the benefits of protecting your home from dirt and hair, plus an extra layer of soft cushioning that everyone will enjoy lounging on. Slip covers make excellent gifts for longtime pet owners and new inductees to the "Help! My Couch Is Covered With Dog Hair!" club. Save big on getting your furniture cleaned twice a year simply by investing in inexpensive, long lasting slip covers.
So how do you swiftly end the evening without turning your hands into a scabby mess that will screw up your chances of actually going out with someone decent?
Katherine went to Hay-On-Wye, where they scheduled her event at the same time as the England vs Argentina semi-final. It was raining. Most people stayed at home to watch the football. She hasn’t been invited back.
-then stitches forming the sole of the foot (2a), alternating with the stitches forming the upper foot (2b), in the round (2a, 2b, 2a, 2b etc again, in a continuous spiral) until the sole and upper foot sections are the correct length.
“Then spake Jesus again unto them, saying, I am the light of the world; he that followeth me shall not walk in darkness, but shall have the light of life.”
In marketing theory, one classic strategy for the brand leader is to do a job that grows the whole market rather than trying to steal share form your competitors. The theory is that if you're already the biggest, advertising what's good about the whole market means you benefit everyone else, but if the market grows proportionately then you'll gain more in volume terms than everyone else does. Most new entrants to any market tend to go for the biggest brands, so you'll probably grow disproportionately, benefiting everyone but, most of all, yourself.
I am now committed to writing a weekly gratitude blog, so stay tuned for next week’s post.
A lot of people have never heard of Timor Leste, how did you become involved with the country?
Ephesians 6:10-20
One downside is that my artist husband loves it as much as I do and therefore, once again, I’m only allocated one drawer. Pants.
i tend to get lost, diy or die, i am a complete mess, let me sort my head and ill sing you a song, i probably wont like it next year, things are never what they seem, and i cant figure this out. trust me, you have no idea.
Goddess: Strong woman
I'm not bitter. Okay... maybe I'm a little bitter. But, I have my reasons. Several of them in fact. Each more tragic and pitiably clichéd than the last. The most obvious (and also the most trivial) is that I, Imogen Keegan, am not a hot girl. Hell, I'm not even a pretty girl. At least not according to any human being with eyeballs. Sadly enough, I might have been lovely. If life hadn't dealt me this handful of pain and sadness. But, it did. And as easily as a footprint is wiped from a sandy beach, my grief swept, as a great wave, and stripped me and my life of all of its current and potential beauty. Grief can do that.
Here's a quicky for you...
If you could have a dinner with three guests – (living or dead), who would you choose and why?
Bliss!
“For though we live in the world, we do not wage war as the world does. The weapons we fight with are not the weapons of the world. On the contrary, they have divine power to demolish strongholds. We demolish arguments and every pretension that sets itself up against the knowledge of God, and we take captive every thought to make it obedient to Christ.” 2 Corinthians 10:3-5
A round of applause,
1 resigning
I glanced at the sweet old couple next to us, twitched a timid smile at them and feared the Gucci-clad-ice-queen was going to pelt me with focaccia rolls from the ornate porcelain bowl next to her. This is not done. I should've known, I mean this ain't my first time at the rodeo, and looking at people is asking for trouble.
We simply cannot afford to pay for these additional items because every penny we possess is allocated to the Euro Election Campaign.
The cover and illustrations by Jim Kay beautifully evoke what’s going on in the story. They go right to the heart of things, but good luck trying to describe them.
And I always tell myself to turn off my inner editor while I’m writing a first draft, but I just can’t. I read over sentences and chapters compulsively, rearranging, editing...
According to the big wig colour predictors, 2009 has been declared the year of Mimosa. Officially it is PANTONE 14-0848 Mimosa. And just what the hell is Mimosa other than a tasty beverage? Well for those of you here in Australia, you should be very familiar with this little gem as it is in fact a part of our national emblem. Those of us on a first name basis with this one know it as Golden Wattle. The flower that children all over the country take to their teachers, causing their hay fever to flare irreparably for the day, as it sheds its pollen like talcum powder in sheets on your clothes.
The movie ends with some info flashed on the screen that makes it seem like this was all true. Before Starkwell had time to explain to Lovelock that this was just part of the film, Lovelock promptly shit his pants. Fantastic film.
Tim Pratt – From Around Here
Demanding ang mga girlfriend. Gusto ganito. Gusto ganyan. Ewan!
A rare group of vintage prints by Norman Parkinson
Tickets sales close in just over ten day's time so, if you've been umm-ing and ahh-ing, now is the time to get off the fence and book your place. Go here to book your tickets and then go here to the event's Flickr page to find out who else is going, where we're going on Friday night, who's arriving when and who's staying in which hotel.
A constant fight
AHHHHHH!!! Oh wait, I need to tell you something… I will be trying to get back on Twitter, I will be getting GM back up, and I am working on a book for Batch files. I’m really busy, and more posts will soon follow.
"Boy, I got some leaving to do"
"Stay the hell out of our town, yuppies," says Koko. "Except for the studio tour, when we'd like your money."
Enrollment-Based Options: These invest in a series of portfolios that become more conservative as the beneficiary nears enrollment.
view, perhaps that might take hold. In fact, I don't want to see another
Many people didn’t know what to make of Twitter at first. After all, how much could one express of oneself with messages of just 140 characters or less each? As it turned out, there was a much bigger audience for such a service than anyone could have imagined. Twitter’s blog post today said:
5. When did you decide you wanted to write?
That has led an unprecedented number to conclude that if they can simply replace all the bums (including their own members of Congress and the president), things will improve.
TALKSPORT
A pair of Baby Phat Watches is an ideal choice for those who care to wear a brand name but have to face the constraints of a strict budget system. So, it doesn’t matter if you are a normal college going student or an office going professional, as, at the end of it all, you would always need a lovely watch to show you the real time.
"So what's gonna change the tide for us then Black Pudding?"
I honestly don't know what I'd do without them!
Mislead
But this gets us to thinking. And brings me to my question.
Addendum 5/30/11: Paul Biba wrote a great review of this session:
"I really, really want to have a final exit and then be able to look back on that as a final exit. I don't know... I just don't want to take away from that exit by making cameos in the future. I'd quite like it to be final and for people just to remember it fondly." Karen then added, "I don't even know what I'm hoping for. I just know that whatever I hope for, I read it and it's always better!"
UPDATE: The best ecology quotes seem to be those that insult ecology–and some of them are from ecologists! A commenter quotes Elton, writing in his famous Animal Ecology book, defining ecology as “The science which says what everyone knows in language that no one understands.” And this compilation of ecology quotes includes evolutionary biologist E. B. Ford’s remark, “It seems to me that ecology describes what animals do, when they are doing nothing interesting.”
There is something to keep in mind and I don’t know if this was just the rules of our tour or the train itself. We were told the largest piece of luggage we could take is a carry on suitcase and encouraged to only take a small bag with the bare necessities. Everyone’s luggage is stored inside the car in the center by the doors. So it would make sense that there would be a limit per person but this isn’t something I verified.
The glow came with the morning and the nightmare was tragically averted. It makes no apology only that with relief of the breach comes a new kind of agony. A new damage… but manageable.
It was easy to agree with the hypothesis but defining what finesse looks like was when the heavy mental lifting took place.
The salads were small, but delicious – greens with a light dressing of cider vinaigrette:
Blog seeks logo -- can you help? Since its inception the 1709 Blog, which covers all sorts of copyright issues, hasn't had its own logo but has simply made do with the portrait of Queen Anne, the monarch in whose reign the first British copyright legislation was passed. But now the team feels it's time for a change. The blog's appearance will shortly be refreshed by the adoption of a new template and, to commemorate this auspicious event, a brand new logo is sought. A prize, in the form of a copy of International Copyright by Paul Goldstein and Bernt Hugenholtz, will go to the best effort received by midnight on Sunday 3 April. Please send your entry to Jeremy here with the subject line "1709 logo", and remember to let the blog have an irrevocable non-exclusive licence to use it on the blog and for its promotions ...
Sommer weaves together the story of Hank Greenberg, the first Jewish baseball star, with the history of America during the 1930s and 1940s in this accessible biography for tweens and teens. I really enjoyed reading this biography, and will review it in depth tomorrow.
But I’m going to give myself an extra point for figuring out that the end result was going to be Labour, Scottish Green, and SNP, about 28 hours before the electoral computers processed the count. Four points out of seven. I win. (Yes, okay, I was awarding the points. What? I was totally fair.)
In order to survive martial law the following things should be considered. You will need to prepare beforehand by becoming as self reliant as possible; avoid traveling to any and all areas under martial law; do not draw attention to yourself or your family during times of martial law; stay informed and never accept the governments word at face value. Remember your survival trumps obeying dictates. I’ll repeat that…..your survival trumps obeying dictates.
small grating of nutmeg
Now, add to our “modern” communications the birth and growth of personal computers which in turn brought us e-mail and instant messaging (IM). According to “Email Statistics Report” – THE RADICATI GROUP, 2011-2015, In 2011, the typical corporate email user sends and receives about 105 email messages per day. Furthermore, the report mentions that the number of worldwide email accounts is expected to increase at an average annual growth rate of 7% over the next four years. As far as IM is concerned, in 2011, the number of worldwide IM accounts was estimated to be nearly 2.6 billion and expected to realize an average annual growth rate of 11%.
fingers around the warm mug of coffee. Scettico seemed to hate her before
One thing that really surprised me was the lack of collectables. Any veteran Gears player remembers hunting for those hidden COG tags and other pieces of memorabilia around levels. None of that is here in RAAMs Shadow and I for one actually don’t mind that. I found that instead of walking down every dead-end corridor and looking around every object, I was able to focus more on the story and gorgeous environment. So even though it kills the replayability, I don’t actually mind it. Also, there are some tedious sections of levels like dealing with waves of tickers in a congested room or fending off a frenzy of wretches. Not as fun as fighting the actual locust drones in a more open area.
Julie was planning a trip to Wyoming to attend her grandson’s wedding. When they returned I would drop the CD of photos by her office. But then she had to go to Seattle for chemotherapy. By the time I took the CD to her, the change was startling. She was sitting at her desk hooked up to oxygen. Her voice was raspy and I knew then how very ill she was. “But, here she is still working,” I thought. She was poised, matter-of-fact. I wanted to give her the photos as a gift, but I knew that she expected to pay something. I charged a minimal rate knowing that if I gave them to her it was like I was saying, “I know you are going to die.” I did not want to acknowledge I was going to lose my friend when I wasn’t paying attention. I told her I would call soon.
i about cried right there.
4/3 Kimberly Derting at Confessions of a Bookaholic
Their glories received with pretentious nods.
One of my favorite smells in the world is freshly baked bread. When I was little, my family and I lived with a neighbor as my dad was in the process of building our new home. Estella, our neighbor and close family friend, would bake all the time. So, when I got off the bus from school each day, it was a regular occurrence for me to have freshly baked snacks to eat. Sometimes she would make cookies, sometimes apple turn overs, but more often than not, Estella would bake bread.
For this open call, you can chose 1, 2 or all 3 of the questions and answer them individually. Your answer must be presented on a 5" x 5" square, which could be a piece of paper, cardstock, canvas, wood panel, fabric...could be anything. Your answer must be in words, which can be written, typed, drawn, sewn, painted, etc. Since we are artists, I encourage you (but you do not have to) also make your submission visually interesting...in any way you desire.
Hello and Welcome to Sherrie Scraps with Passion!!
For most of these children come from lone-mother households. And the single most crucial factor behind all this mayhem is the willed removal of the most important thing that socialises children and turns them from feral savages into civilised citizens: a father who is a fully committed member of the family unit.
Malema’s timing could hardly have been worse. Last weekend in the remote farming community of Colenso, in KwaZulu-Natal, Nigel Ralfe, 71, a dairy farmer, and his wife Lynette, 64, were gunned down as they milked their cows. He was critically injured; she died.
Ethical business practices should promote periodic reviews but it appears that the only reviews have been of the annual reports. Why have we not had an on-going agency study or review for the last 25 years or so? Could it be that we are so taken in by the all encompassing custodial nature of total government that we have lost the ability to think and act on matters that concern our most vital possession, our health?
15-20 scorched almonds (or the equivalent amount of dark chocolate and almonds as suggested above)
So we will see. I have this paper from a pullout section in Somerset Studio and I would really like to create this paper onto the cover using paint and the silhouette of the young girl. Stay tuned for updates.
No one could argue that the plot, for what it is, isn’t fast paced. In fact, it’s too fast paced. There’s no time to catch your breath or absorb what’s happening. It’s set piece, after set piece, after set piece. A sub-plot involving Thompson and Thomson on the hunt for a pickpocket is loaded with running around and slapstick, when it could have been wisely used as a sort of interval from the action. Even the most ADHD ridden child high on Vimto will want to stop for a fag break.
Yeah she was beautiful but she didn't mean a thing to me.
Jim White - drums.
"Beautiful Maria of My Soul"(The Mambo Kings)(Robert Kraft and Arne Glimcher)
Gaudi’s style is so distinct, so seemingly unrestricted to a point of flamboyance. You don’t need a tour guide to spot a Gaudi when walking the streets of Barcelona. Casa Battlló is a prime example of Gaudi’s art. The “wavy” structures, ceramic-filled towers, stained glass windows framed by intricately-designed ironworks.. For sure, Gaudi raised a lot of eyebrows during his time!
This is Dj Tre.. hit me up on twitter @Justint_Djtre and check out my show only kssu.com tuesday 5-6 PM.
5 Am I Blue?
She said "I want to be in Rome on the first day of spring, listening to the church bells going off at sunset.. blah blah blah blah blah" I kind of trailed off but you get the picture.
It was last week that my new Jimmy lost all of its oil pressure, leaving me to walk to work this, and last week. I took the vehicle to a mechanic and, after a week, picked it up and returned to work. Within three miles, I had lost five quarts of oil and returned to work with my engine smoking. It will be monday before the mechanic can pick it up which means not pictures again this weekend.
(1) It's a super high-end type of green tea.
Gamekeeper replies 'I said use both hands - you get more that way'
In the past century, the introduction of technology has brought fine-art into our homes. This only advanced with the evolution of technology, computers and the internet. It also allowed another branch of art to form — digital art.
with the outrageous poetry known as Flarf. Gardner has
I like it here, the weather is perfect...today!
5. Moonrise Kingdom (May 25) – Like Ruby Sparks, Moonrise Kingdom is yet another independent film looking to capitalize on the counterprogramming success that indie films often see during the summer months when all anyone talks about are blockbusters. If a cast that includes Bruce Willis, Edward Norton, Bill Murray, Frances McDormand, and Tilda Swinton wasn’t enough, the film is also the return of director Wes Anderson, the wry, indie auteur behind the brilliant Rushmore and Fantastic Mr. Fox. If you’re one of Wes Anderson’s many followers like I am, I know you probably can’t wait for this latest outing, which tells the sweet story of a pair of young lovers who run away from their New England town, prompting a community wide search to find them. If Kingdom is as deliciously wry and visually offbeat as any of Anderson’s previous works, than it probably will be the perfect film to escape the many blockbusters of the summer with.
Furthermore, the careless rhetoric of some eminent citizens from within the PDP and the opposition – like those who even promised to make the nation ungovernable-that fertilized the ovary of the new Boko Haram. An ovary genetically engineered to birth in 2015, I think.
Kozakura, 38, was convicted last year of property destruction after a man said she kicked in the wooden door of his room and crawled inside, apparently because he was with another woman. Kozakura had said the man made the hole himself.
Public sector union PCS general secretary Mark Serwotka opposed this at a conference fringe meeting. He explained that this would lead to a "different kind of welfare state with working people getting priority over the unemployed." He pointed out cold facts like in Merthyr Tydfil there are 1,500 people on jobseeker's allowance chasing 39 vacancies!
in a pickle jar, leaf through my papers.
Actors are an excellent example of this. We tend to project upon them a personality we think they should have based solely on the information that we glean about them from their films. Hopefully we think the best of them, but in reality they are often completely different to how we imagine them. In fact I’ve caught on to this now and if someone is about to tell me some sordid story about an actor that I like, I have to stop them. to be honest I’d rather not know and live with an imagined personality and still enjoy the films.
We have had a busy summer with lots of swimming, beach days, swimming lessons, family time and so on.Its been wonderful. But as I saw today, its been a bit too busy for my kids. Jacob only left his room today to eat and he never turned on the PlayStation. That is when you know it is time for a break.
You may make a Chouder for a thousand men.
Puppy days are well and truly over and, as I anticipated, she is proving to be quite a challenge. She has great drive and lots of courage – no problem scaling a near vertical bank, through a barbed wire fence and into thick cover to find her dummy. Lots of persistence and will continue hunting until she has found it. Wonderful nose but, I’m hesitant to say, very little self-control when we’re out in the field.
From Denmark, Herslev Bryghus IPA is probably the palest IPA I have tasted. It looked like a pale lager in the glass, and there was some carbonation and a medium sized head. I felt some grapefruit and apples in the nose, while the beer tasted of apples, citrus and some pine before a partly bitter finish. This was a nice beer, but I was a bit disappointed that I did not feel the grapefruit promised from the aromas when I tasted it.
One of the unfortunate results of teaching 5-year olds is the constant sickness that comes with the elementary school environment. During my first winter in Turkey I was sick every week with a different ailment. I was even lucky enough to bond with my future mother-in-law when we both caught the swine flu at the same time. While my immune system continues to grow stronger and more able to fight every variation of the flu and the common cold, I have also adopted a strict regiment of vitamins to ensure I am not constantly ill. However, it is not entirely avoidable. This week, I was reminded of this the hard way. Out of necessity, I spent my birthday and the day that followed it sick in bed. While everyone hates being sick, there are some more reasons to despise this miserable condition in Istanbul.
I hope you had a great Tuesday. Did you know that Tuesdays are the most productive day of the week? What did you do today? Any advice on how to keep on track with your schedules?
plucked up to cover your act.
You have given something one too many a puff.
The mediocre super-hero movies of this year’s batch. They both had cool things (most of the Thor/ Asgard stuff , and Fassbender). They both also had some fairly glaring flaws (most of the Earth stuff in Thor, and the horrible, over-the-top acting of Kevin Bacon in X-Men). Origin stories are interesting sometimes, and sometimes they feel like setup. These two flicks wound up more on the “felt like setup” side. Thor was the most obviously “engineered for The Avengers” of all of the pre-avengers movies. X-Men seemed to want to establish a new group of actors to play younger versions of these characters, because presumably Famke Janssen, Hugh Jackman, James Marsden are all too fucking old at this point, or have realized they have better things to do. If that’s the case with X-Men, I give it a pass, because I like the new cast. Unfortunately, I fear that Jennifer Lawrence may have something better to do now (what with being the lead in The Hunger Games and all).
me when I was only 1-3 years old. not sure. this has always been one of my favorite pictures. I was sooo sad bc I couldnt go out and play... if only I would have known that would be the least of my worries when I turned 19
On Friday, we played tourist in Paris, it was pretty good.
"Well I'll tell you what I really, really want, shamon...heee--heeee!"
have great support for arches,
The Three Most Interesting Trends in the Modern Headphones Market
Now, let's move on to second grade, shall we?
And talking of Easter, here's my share for today ...
Y'all found any fab clothing lately? I need an Anthro intervention!
(which was easy for her)
Never before has such a prestigious program opened its door to the coaching world as in this landmark DVD from Geno Auriemma. Take a courtside seat as Auriemma coaches and narrates his way through the first four practices of the 2008-09 season. From the tone-setting circle to the last made free throw, Auriemma ta… Read More >>
Small bowls for chopped vegetables
Scottish Parliament see the value of community radio
Furthermore, BMF says, Carlo Sommaruga is pressuring the Swiss government to freeze assets held by Musa Aman and by other Malaysian potentates, such as Sarawak Chief Minister Taib Mahmud and his family members.
No steps really needed here.
By not consuming appropriately, you might be not just opening oneself up to possessing lower energy quantities and becoming vulnerable to exhaustion, but you may also have other health difficulties down the road, such as heart disease, which are connected to your poor diet later in life. For the body’s sake and to keep you feeling alive and able to go, getting the best diet plan is crucial.
Meg sighed heavily, took off her glasses and twirled them, put them back on again. "Well, I know Charles Wallace is different, and I know he's something more. I guess I'll just have to accept it without understanding it."
You start with a Mexican blend canned corn. I tried making it with two different varieties - 'standard' Mexicorn and Chipotle White Corn. They were both good, but I liked the Mexicorn version better. By just a little bit.
It always leads me here
This is not a paradox I want to resolve here. Rather, I will suggest that if discontinuity is reached while European natives are still majorities in their own countries, any large-scale violent conflict between Muslims and those natives will quickly work to the advantage of the latter. Any violence that could be categorized as Option 3 (under my existing taxonomy of de-Islamization) combined with the other provisions of Option 1 that would already be in place, would have such a drastic effect on Muslim populations that de-Islamization could be completed almost entirely within the confines of Option 1.
This is a family recipe I learned from my mother-in-law, Lil. You remember her from these. Well this kugel has been made in this house for well over 30, (ok, almost 40 years!) and it's always a welcome and comforting dish, no matter what season or holiday. And it's so easy to throw together.
"But it says 'naked'."
What happens when Jeremey and Julian run away from thefuture that has been planned for them? And what happens when other, less idealistic immortals take notice of Jeremey and begin making plans of their own?
During this time, wash, and cut the plums in two, take out the pit and place them in a dish.
Finally at mile 7, I stopped to retie my left shoe. Unfortunately, the laces slipped through my sweaty fingers and after a couple aborted attempts, finally produced an awkward looking but effective knot that kept my left shoe on tight. I figured it was worth stopping to tie my shoe, that I'd only lose maybe ten seconds and a couple places retying it, but the resulting damage was far greater, something like 30 seconds and countless people whizzing by my as a struggled to tie a knot any 1st grader could make.
SAD1 Indonesian husband, Lolo Soetoro Mangunharjo, was an army colonel in General Suharto’s CIA-backed rank of killers.[87]
Blush and shadows swatched below:
Pages 24, 25 and 26 Original Art from Gene Colan’s Little Shop of Horrors – winner $200 (cgrew)
-cayenne pepper
Tugs
"They come in all sorts of different colours and they are all made of very warm thermal warm material, like fleeces," he added.
When I first went on Pinterest I couldn't believe how many types of foods were being made in mason jars. You can now add to that food made in plastic cups for individual serves such as Mexican dip or individual desserts. This is such a great idea for parties - if you are a super patient person who is really going to go through and layer seven types of dip into fifty plastic cups and add corn chips or if you only have less than ten people at your parties. That idea rocks if that's the case.
But it wasn't so easy. My first year here was FULL of encounters with various interesting people. I was very prayerful about how I spent my time, and about each relationship. Perhaps it happens for many missionaries or any Christian servants, that they expect miracles at first and look at each day with such hope and anticipation...
and fruits magically appear…
endless miles,
Now to you who has read this far, I challenge you! You knew this would come right?!
When I started this blog about 6 months ago following our wedding, I wanted to prove a point. That two people of different backgrounds, along with their families and communities, can all get along. J and I have a mixed marriage in pretty much every sense of the term . . . mixed race and mixed religion to start. He was born and grew up in the ‘burbs, I grew up in the city. His family is small and close. My family is huge and spread throughout the world. And do we all get along? YES!
-dreads
Slimware is a unique line of casual dinnerware with an emphasis on portion consciousness fused with elegant yet convenient dining. Why waste time with the tedious task of counting calories when you can just use your eyes to limit your portions. If you eat less, you'll weigh less. Each plate's imagery incorporates designated food placement areas that correspond to recommended food portions (illustrated below) and serve as a gentle visual reminder not to overindulge.
Bloodroot is a story full of magic and maybe a bit of madness, told by several different generations of the same family as they try to puzzle the story of Myra Lamb together. The author did a fantastic job of telling the story through several different voices and perspectives.
Above all these things, let us remember Jesus Christ, who is our Great Apostle and the Great High Priest.
Memories of the nightmare played on. On these same streets, thousands of wounded had limped, transformed by terror and grief. Some had lost their hair in the fire, others, half their faces. The sirens had screamed, flying through the night and days from then on. New York congealed into a mass of the helpless hurt, the faceless who came to help, and the cops and firemen who gave their lives to others whose names they had no chance to ask. Blood flowed from cut limbs, and also from veins held up for the taking. This city of spunk and internal faces broke into a weeping, sobbing, moaning humanity. We, who lived through the nightmare whole days on end on television, could only imagine half the reality then.
One day, I hope to photograph Chernobyl. It’s probably been done a thousand times over by now, but the idea of an entire population vanishing from a city in one day, leaving everything behind, is enough for me to want to go. I enjoy abandoned places. They’re very peaceful, but somehow you are always on edge. It’s a weird feeling I suppose. When I arrive in Ottawa, I’d like to look for a couple of places to practice this fun style of photography. Anyone interested is welcome to tag along! I hear there is strength in numbers when it comes to ghosts that haunt places like this…
DECLARE result varchar;
There is another reading - care of the Organisation of the Islamic Conference (OIC). That is, human rights as they are perverted - or even negated - by a sharia/Islamic misreading of what is, after all, a thoroughly Western - and utterly non-Islamic - concept.
Every year, without fail, my daughter and I do a bit of gardening, I have never been one for ‘Gardeners World‘ but she and I both love the brightness of sunflowers so before you get the lovely flower, of course you have to plant the seed. This was planted early but with some very hot days and some cloudy wet miserable days the sunflower* isn’t above 1 metre tall yet.
Also, please don’t complain about this new arrangement of partners for a few of you. This change was necessary to adopt to this specific situation to even out the number of students between the two classes, TDA A & B.
The Thunder are on their way to the ultimate de-throne, on the bye. When they get way ahead and you can’t quite reach them, they can get sloppy and it doesn’t matter. This (like the Heat) is a supreme luxury, and one that elite talent teams can afford. OKC goes straight street-ball when they take the early lead, exchanging iso’s and letting Harden call his own fouls. Brooks: “Keep shooting, Kevin. Please.”
“I didn’t do anything! I just need you to tell me everything you know about riding side saddle.”
The other says, "She's waiting for him to kick off!"
At the check out I fumbled through my case and there was Martin’s business card again… and I realized that I hadn’t given Martin a second thought since I kissed Harry for the first time. Looking down at that card I knew that I didn’t want it anymore.
To the, ahem, charming anonymous poster who left a comment on the previous post I would have a lot more respect for you if you weren't too afraid to say who you are! I could say so much but instead will just point out that it was a light-hearted post and it's MY blog and I'll say or ask what I like thanks. If you don't like what you see then please don't read it!
Thanks for dropping by to check out my latest project and I'd like to extend a warm welcome to my two new Followers, I hope you'll pop back from time to time to see what I'm getting up to on my table of craftiness.
I hold my phone preciously, as if made of diamond
For more information about this animal, call:
They think I don’t know that they gradually increased the volume of water I carry on a walk – but of course I do! I now carry two litres and I am really proud to do so.
5. Bake for about 30 minutes or until a toothpick comes out clean.
I am grateful for this little peanut, for example.
I'm lowering my blood pressure
This week I've based my pages around a 6 1/2 inch paper pad from Kaisercraft called Bonjour. The elements from this pad made co-ordinating my pages sooooo easy...I will definitely be using this approach again :)
As luck would have it, a journalist from a local newspaper had come to see the film and briefly asked Ranjit a few questions with his notebook in hand. When the journalist suggested that movie directors should be allowed a bit of artistic licence to make their films more interesting, Ranjit replied:
Another thing I did yesterday was to join a writer's group. I've been a part of online ones on and off for years, but this one is a face to face group. I was nervous to say the least. Reading a critique of your work in the safety of your own home, where no one can see you cry and gnash your teeth is one thing, but to have someone tell you what they thought right to your face is terrifying. Or so I thought. It actually wasn't that bad. We even had fun. Even better, I found out what was bugging me about Chapter One, as well as a 'staring me in the face' way to fix it that I would never have seen because I was focused too closely.
Whatever happened with the lights out, the girl is now saying that she is afraid to walk her dog. I feel sorry for the dog, who must be wondering why its mistress is so horribly traumatised. If I were the girl’s counsellor, I would attempt to reassure her with the following words.
Where UKUnpublished come in as a serious plus is providing a service for the author who can provide completed files in MS Word file, but without the knowhow of—or confidence—to use a service like Lightning Source or go directly to a printer requiring complete PDF's who cannot provide online and database book listing and access to online distribution globally.
Happy New Year to all fellow Bloggers!
I have been considering this post for a bit. What makes a friend? I have mulled this over for a few weeks now. Some of my friends are rather new, and many, many are quite old ( as in I have been friends with them for many years, not age-related). Some friends to me are inanimate objects, for instance, these fall mornings as I step outside to do chores, it is still dark. But I look into the sky and see my friend Orion gazing out into the heavens from his kneeling vantage point. He is friendly to me because he is always there, unchanging, I can count on him being there for me to see. I have been looking a lot into the heavens, learning the constellations and the stars that they are comprised of. Betelgeuse is one of the stars in the Orion constellation, I like this star solely because of its name. Pronounced "beetlejuice", this star reminds me of the movie starring Micheal Keaton, and I really enjoyed that movie! Another star in the Orion constellation is Bellatrix, and for those Harry P fans, we know who she is certainly along with her cousins Sirius and Regulus ( both are also heavenly bodies seen in the autumn skies here in Minnesota). I never was able to make a connection with J.K. Rowling for how she chose the names of her characters, I think she too, looked into the heavens and was inspired. Without doing any homework on this, I can only speculate, but the names ARE there. My friends, the stars.
Once they were out of the oven I then did some Yorkshire pudding. The best method for a successful YP is equal quantities of eggs, flour and milk (in this case 3 eggs ratio) and a very hot oven and a preheated tray with a high burning temperature oil in each section. These can be made well in advance and simply reheated again under a grill (watch they don’t burn)
-- ... Carlos seems to sense I'm going to be trouble from the moment he explains that tango is a dance where the man leads, the man makes all the decisions ...Oooh, aren't you special. Information: to master the woman's part of any led-and-followed partner dance in the very varied family of traditional European-style partner dances where the man's part includes leading, you have to first learn to follow.
But there are good reasons for the lack of blogging.
If I were going to spend a gazillion dollars, I would buy a few of these:
Now, if one says that a single Grim Reaper caused Fred to cease to exist, then there must be some sufficient reason why that Grim Reaper (call it Grim Reaper A) is the cause of Fred’s ceasing to exist rather than any other Grim Reaper. Thus, the Principle of Sufficient Reason, it seems, is in danger of being undermined. On the other hand, if all the Grim Reapers caused Fred to cease to exist then an infinite number of causes exist for one single effect. This conclusion seems to undermine that which the Grim Reaper argument is intended to demonstrate: namely that there cannot be an infinite set of causes for a single effect.
The High-frequency Active Auroral Research Program (HAARP) is a congressionally initiated program jointly managed by the U.S. Air Force and U.S. Navy. The United States Congressional records show that HAARP is funded by the US government. The U.S. Senate set aside $15 million dollars in 1996 (Clinton administration) to develop the ability to penetrate the earth with signals bounced off of the ionosphere. This earth-penetrating-tomography has since been developed and used by the US government to look inside the planet to a depth of many kilometers in order to locate underground munitions, minerals and tunnels. The problem is that the frequencies used by HAARP for earth-penetrating tomography is also within the frequency range most cited for disruption of earth’s own electromagnetic field.
My food baby is poufing out over the top of my jeans, which clearly indicates that I in no way can clean house right now. I might pull a muscle, or something. Or give myself a giant pie hernia. So, instead, I'm hanging out on my new couch, with all my new cats, and watching football instead.
Simon Clark, director of Forest, said:
Participation: You are expected to attend every class and screening, for the full amount of time we meet, be actively engaged with the class, and to be respectful of myself, your classmates, and the course objectives and rules. This also includes keeping laptops and cellphones stowed away during screenings. Laptops are only to be used for note-taking.
(b) Discuss the principle of matched filter
I was upfront about the restricted hours I have to work within, shaped by the needs of my very young family that I will always put first. But I was also upfront about my enthusiasm and how I would do everything in my power to do the best job possible.
This line, being a quote from David Whitehouse at the end of the piece in Scotland on Sunday yesterday about the Rangers bids, got me thinking. I fully expect that I am making a mountain out of not even a molehill here, so I offer everything I write below with the caveat that there is no concrete evidence to prove this is the plan, other than my own suspicions.
‘A couple of knuckleheads shouldn’t detract from what they do,’ Obama said. ‘What these guys were thinking, I don’t know. That’s why they’re not there anymore’.
Current treatment options include removal of the affected prostate, as well as your typical cancer treatment options (chemotherapy and radiation).
and they would probably both fit into the
Next stop: Civic Center Station. From here it’s a short walk to one of the most celebrated retailers, City Beer Store, where you can buy singles and even drink them in the store for a buck as corkage fee, not to mention there are about six rare beers on tap at all time. This is the place to shop if you brought an empty suitcase you plan on filling up before heading home.
GREEN IJ, HUNG SC, IRVING GS, DAVENPORT JV. Influenza A virus aboard a US Navy ship in 1972 and the antibody response of the crew to influenza vaccine. Mil Med 1975; 140: 179-181.
The go to girl for anything Sarah doesn't want to dirty her hands with. Learned all the ins and outs of fraud, forgery, embezzlement and money laundering of Trust Fund money from her mother Cheryl King/Moseley. Known for her uncanny ability to orate falsehoods, insatiable greed and lack of being able to keep promises or put together quarterly reports. She's sole trustee of the Alaska Fund Trust, the personal slush fund for the Palin family, which was found by the investigator hired by the personnel board to be unethical and/or illegal, yet still continues to solicit donations. Appointed to head the Board of Agriculture and Conservation by Palin, a farm regulatory position that by state law must go to someone with strong agricultural and business experience. She continues to run this position with an iron fist, removing anyone who would question her authority, even though her appointment expired in '09. Appointed herself Chair of the Matanuska Creamery, a private dairy that sprung up after the hostile takeover of Mat Maid by the Corrupt Bitches Club, that continues to drain state and federal money at an alarming rate. I guess as a real estate agent, perhaps she sold a farm sometime giving her the qualifications for these positions and it shows.
I cringed inside. I can’t help it. That was the million-dollar question wasn’t it? But it didn’t help us pick between our excellent field! I had to do a bit of past reflection and ask myself will they be able to perform the tasks that I have done over the year? Since my position’s purpose and tasks shifted significantly my successor is not doing exactly every single thing that I did in my way and I have to consider that too. After the minutes stretched we finally came to a final choice.
According to MotiveQuest, OPS measures the number of people online who are recommending your brand to others combined with sentiment measures, which are a way to determine the attitude — sentiment — expressed in online postings. MotiveQuest says OPS differentiates persons who discuss more than one product and assigns a score to their most-favored brand.
I have been looking for the green root cake-decorating thing, which I think is called anjelica, to make Nigella’s puddini bonbons again, and in the process I’ve walked up and walked down two supermarket home-cooking aisles whilst shaking my head a lot.
Moreover, the Website also has sidebars -under the name of ‘Browse by category’, and which actually conveys the same content with menus, but it facilitates individual user to find relevant information with less effort. It seems that the sidebar is created based on the different target groups and their needs; targets are fashion PR agency, fashion PR job seeker, fashion related company, etc. In brief, it shows directly what different sorts of services this company is offering to different targets accordingly. For instance, it displays the news about fashion PR jobs with position and location info for job seekers, at the same time, right under that information it also exhibits ‘Post a Job for $25’ for fashion PR agencies. The other feature is that it has widgets that connect to its all social-network platforms –Twitter, Facebook, Pinterest, Quora, Google+, and Tumblr. These sites are interrelated and make users easy to share contents.
Some of my readers might have wondered why my blog is called Than's thought collection. Well, Than, is my nickname. It's funny how people get nicknames. I came about getting mine when I was about one or two years old, when my brother, who is about eight-teen months older then I, had a bad time pronouncing my name, Nathanael. So he just said Than instead. Which if you notice, its part of my name, Na(than)ael. So now, almost all of my friends call me Than. One thing that I would like to do is make a tag where you say what your nickname is and how you got it. If anyone wants to do it, you can, but I don't want to tag anyone. Have a great sunday!
Wine selection is Meister and Cockles area of expertise. With a considered debate and lots of questions of the staff we start with the Chateau Petit Val Grand Cru, St Emilion, Bordeaux, 2005. I will
A blaze on board a packed jet forced an emergency landing at Gatwick yesterday.
And live on a hill.
When he isn't making messes, cleaning, swimming, cheering on the Utes, watching Rugby, playing with his buddies, attending hot air balloon festivals, getting a haircut, taking family pictures or playing flag football, he is inventing things to use everyday objects for...
the Renaissance resists
This week it's the fifth of our 'First Friday of the Month' Colour Combo Challenges and this time it's Keilly here to give you your May Colour Combo...
“However, I would make the point that I was very frustrated in my job as I was unable to fulfil the job specification which was originally outlined for me. This was to control the major aspects of the football department outwith the first team operations.
Pre marinade some chicken dices in sweet chilli (pref home made) and season with lemon juice, garlic and coriander. Leave for an hour or so and then cook.
They Are Focused On Client
there is no danger
A very nice sales associate finally approached me and asked if I needed some assistance. She was like me, older and single digit size challenged. I pictured her to be a happy mother of teenage boys with a dog and a husband who likes to go camping. I don't know why. These are the things that go through my mind in split seconds, people. I realize I may need medication, but the imagination is what keeps life exciting.
In any case, this story started with a mixer, as I said, I went to the one day sale at Macy's (who knew I actually paid attention to things like that, but no matter) and bought a mixer as well as a tart pan, some mixing bowls, and a nice whisk. While I was at the counter, the lady working there said that I was sure to find a man now, "since so few women bake these days." She also pointed out that my good looks plus baking would guarantee a man who would have no reason to leave. We had a good laugh about that. While we were laughing, some other Macy's employees came over to see what the fuss was about. One of the guys saw my mixer and asked, "Oh did you register for the other one and trade it in for this?"
He restores my soul;
“WHERE IS MY YARDSTICK????????”
Yeah, this thing - this atrocity of fast foodiness - has been haunting our household, particularly Bubba's part of the household, for some time. My beloved, he has an odd weakness for KFC, and although he's able to avoid its grotesqueness 99.99% of the time, every now and then he can be found elbow deep in a red and white striped box that's gone nearly transparent on the bottom and sides from the...ahem...goodness held therein.
NUJ head of publishing Barry Fitzpatrick said: “I’m pleased that we have been able to hold genuinely positive discussions with management to resolve the differences between us. Both sides recognise that producing newspapers which serve local communities properly is a business requiring commitment from everybody involved.
Signed
I know, seems strange-- the transition from loud, cantankerous drill sergeant to a humble servant of God. But actually I think it makes perfect sense when you think about it. I mean, in the military everything is black and white and there is no questioning orders from those in charge. There is a clearly defined enemy, and that enemy must be defeated by any means necessary. Is that really that much different from religion?
Acts 27:11
Shopping is good for young fashionistas who is in their 20's. There are so many things to buy and prices are really cheap compared to what you get in KK. My friends and @meitzeu enjoyed shopping for clothing, fashion accessories and skin care very much. But, shopping in Taiwan for me is very practical instead of splurge. What I bought in Taizhong and Taipei are only these :
Before we give any money to derivatives issuers like AIG, we should find out what their obligations are, including which of them are to counterparties with "insurable interests" and which are to speculators. Then we'd be in a position to make informed choices about how best to allocate taxpayer money.
_ Scanning photographs to create digitized images and indexing them for easy retrieval ! Being a guest speaker at our Third-Thursday Brown Bag lunch – share your stories about growing up in the County, or discuss some element of Calvert life.
One of the things hindering that process has been that we were two revisions back on our forum software, and the current revisions of PHP and MySQL (the underlying language and database for the forum software), were not bug compatible with the version of the forum software we have been running. Unfortunately, through several test cycles, I had not been able to successfully perform a non-destructive upgrade of the forum software.
"Back to work" Old man stork finally arrived this morning and left a 85 pound bull calf. More veal for the "Antic Locker". We are looking for him again tomorrow, in the hog department. He sure has lots of work around here at the present time.
Now you can paint like your favourite psychos (and by psychos, I mean artists) on the new painting application, Psychopaint!
Rather than traumatising the team, it appeared to galvanise them. They had no great cause for anxie ty before half-time. Ramires did well to climb and meet a Torres cross from the right but the header went wide of the far post. Newcastle were not in the least concerned at that stage. Alan Pardew’s side carried more menace and, just before the interval, Ba demanded a good save from Cech and, moments later, the striker hit the bar with a drive.
Stamps: Flower Fest, Tiny Tags.
“I really don’t have the money to be doing this, even though it makes me soar”
In the Double Shadow, there is a "Memory Machine." If you could choose a moment you could preserve and re-live, what would it be?
Nuts go well with this salad—I probably would have preferred thinly sliced ones as opposed to these slivered ones, but that’s what I had on hand. I think walnuts or pecans would probably also go well in it.
Emily Richards (Dorset, sick for 2 years)
Residents were so motivated they contacted one another, including and other local businesses including the multifaceted arts space Launch Pad who with councilwoman Letitia James held an impromptu rally.
very simple (I think it was actually 'inspired' by a Nigella recipe originally, but I now can't find it, of course). Basically just cook the potatoes (boil or microwave) - just make sure they are still fairly firm otherwise the antlers won't stand-up. The antlers are bread sticks, the nose is half a cherry tomato (held on by a tooth pick) and the eyes are sultanas - voila!!
Time enough to
Huevos Rancheros (with yummy-looking homemade salsa!)
Inika Cosmetics Certified Organic Eyeliner. MARKETING BLURB – “A rich and creamy consistency unparalleled in the world of natural liners.” MY THOUGHTS – ”Quite a marketing statement and probably true, but it’s like saying carrots are unparalleled in the world of orange-coloured, carrot-shaped vegetables, no? They are right though, the pencil is very soft and easily smudgable, perfect for smoky eyes and hiding sins.”
Nonetheless, I arrived this morning and was greeted kindly by everyone. I’d already acquainted myself with the doorman, and we said hello. Again, I said hello to the secretary who’s name still escapes me at the moment, but I will get eventually. Then, I set to work sorting all the result’s I’d entered into a binder by gender, age group and event. This task took me about an hour. I then think I resembled an eager puppy dog ready for as many tasks as they would thrust upon me. So I was given tasks “real work” as I’ll have it said, or not just lowly first week intern work. My supervisor for the day? A woman who reminds me immensely of Emily Blunt’s character in The Devil Wears Prada because of her accent and position at the company, though not snooty in the least. Anyhow, I keep wanting to call her Emily, but I’ve been resisting. So I got to work getting everything ready for the Japan race, a four mile race, which will take place in about a week and a half. As I was going through the schools, I noticed my Alma Mater (can you even say that about a Middle School?), or the school where I joined my first track/cross-country teams. It was on this team, and I realize now, through this program that I’m helping to run, that I ran my first four and five mile races. It was through this program where I discovered my passion for running. And not to sound overly cheesy, but I think it’s amazing that I’m possibly paving the way for kids who were like me, or in a more community service oriented sense, a lot less privileged than I was, to find inspiration through running and kindle their passion.
"He will get home and find a summons for speeding or a really big credit card bill he wasn't expecting" Drawing bad things towards himself he is, that's all.
I thought outside the box with the cans...the way they are situated now, all I have to do is pull out the bin, and I can see everything, label up. Now I feel like I'm maximizing the depth of our pantry but I can actually see it all....and eat it. Which is the overall point, right?
(Oven = 170C)
Mama – Is somebody that cares for your and wants the absolutely best for you. It doesn’t have to be your physical mama, just a person that cares for you.
Just a quick weekend note:
And the crash analyzer will track system crashes and in some cases, at least, give you solutions to the crashes. You’ll notice that there’s no solution for my VLC crash, and that’s because I only installed Soluto on this PC yesterday and haven’t had another crash since.
Musicologist Dr Jonathan Walker accompanies Anna on a historical mission, picking out examples on the piano and explaining why and how our western ears hear certain note configurations as "oriental" - from Chopsticks to Chopin.
just a simple question. But no real answer.
Submitted by Alyssa Macy
I love snow and I've been saying it would be great to have more so that everything feels all Christmassy and magical. Well, as they say, be careful what you wish for: York, like alot of the country, is now blessed with an over-abundance of snow and as well as the mayhem it's causing for everyone else it could also wreck my plans for the coming weekend which was meant to be one of the most important in my life.
He’s got the trust of LeGrand and of his family. Like Katie’s piece, it’s the stuff of a powerful doc. And like Katie’s piece, when you get this kind of access and story, let’s try and go the extra mile and get home with them as well. It could make a huge difference.
My previous attempts to make my past life sound interesting might have been fun and jolly for the young cuddly readers of my Hamish McHaggis stories, but I really want something with a little more street cred for this book and most of my previous life seems just too ordinary.
(Side note: As great as Philip is, I don’t need his validation or his praises to feel good about myself. I love who I am, it’s just an added bonus that someone else does too.) Don’t deprive yourself of the chance of having an added bonus as well.
We'd like to offer a heartfelt thank you to all our readers and subscribers for their attention, support, and participation (we love comments! We love questions!) We couldn't do what we do without you.
Mixed Citrus Blend (orange, lemon and lime) -
As challenging it is... it was so much fun modelling each of these figure :) I guess there is definitely a kid inside all of us! This was for a 22 year old girl who still loves Disney (who doesn't!?)
I find it ironic that our miscarriage happened on the day of the earthquake in Japan. It was hard to think about an entire country getting crushed when my small little world was being shaken up. But a post from the Desiring God blog in response to the earthquake and tsunami also served as a personal encouragement to me. At the end of Piper's prayer was this statement:
The environment Dequan will face in elementary and high schools is defined by its ignorance. Children hate because they have been taught to by the adults in their lives and because they don’t know any other way to behave. In Missouri and Tennessee, there are bills that have been introduced which prohibit any discussion of LGBT topics for grades K-8. They’ve been aptly titled the, “Don’t Say Gay” laws and they have the potential to hurt thousands of young boys and girls in those two states. Simply put, it is state-sponsored discrimination against minors. What does it tell a 7 or 8 year old, who is just beginning to form a conception of the world around him or her, that there are certain people that you just don’t talk about? This is ignorance as academic policy, in the same vein as abstinence only education, but worse. At least with the abstinence only movement, you were attacking a sexual act. With the Don’t Say Gay legislation, you directly attack the individual.
Golden Salad Dressing
This dessert is a total breeze to make, however very impressive and satisfying. I think the warming spice blend successfully compliments the sweet, peachy goodness without being overwhelming. The blueberries, although optional, add amusing punctuation marks throughout the dish, and when crushed release an exquisite swirl of magenta juice. The coconut ice cream is an absolute must, especially if it’s new to you. It’s totally vegan, free of crazy additives, unpronounceable ingredients, and tastes incredible. My favorite brand is Coconut Bliss. Alternatively, you could use canned coconut milk, but keep it in the fridge before serving to ensure it’s cold – the temperature contrast is key.
Of being just a little boy
Which is why I think I have a new in. I spent three hours pouring fountain Pepsi, diet Pepsi, and Mountain Dew. And I cleaned the popcorn machine. Oh - and I refilled the ice. I am ready to ask, "Do you want fries with that?"
While recognizing the challenge New Age spirituality poses to the Church today, the Archbishop says there’s little that is “new” in New Age teachings.
Flats: Gap
Tao Te Ching v14
About 300 g (10 oz) assorted baby leaves
The paperboy winks as he hands her a paper
But she is being held against her will in the dim, twilit world between heaven and hell, where the spirits of the deceased wait before embarking upon their final journey.
MY PICK: BETH PHOENIX.
-Gin and Vitamin Water…a great mix
I’m opening a challenge to my readers today. I’ve had to take some time off drinking beer due to travel and a pinch of sickness, but its wearing off and I’m getting thirsty. I have one update to do from my trip. After that one comes out, however, I’m getting right back at the task at hand. 1 beer at a time.
This year I found a dye kit that appeared to not be as messy as years past. (Especially when used only when the two year old is napping.)
Both St. Hubbins and Tufnel are accomplished songwriters and composers and are responsible for all the many hits the group has charted over the years.
Q080) Where does the inspiration for 2NE1’s fashion come from?
216And whisp'ring angels prompt her golden dreams.
It was not her fault. And while I don’t blame myself for that year, I do regret not knowing/believing that dancing with Naika would be different than dancing with our prior children. My husband and I glanced at one (1) attachment disorder book before Naika came to our home. I vividly remember reading a paragraph or two to him out loud in bed about what kinds of behaviors we might expect from our daughter who spent nearly the first two and a half years of her life in an orphanage; I read them out loud. We agreed that none of it probably would apply to Naika, but if it did–we’d handle it just like we handled the behavior of our first four children. We knew how to dance!
2 tbsp alkalized (Dutch process) cocoa (I omitted in some of my cakes; added equivalent amount of flour)
It's certainly true that significant increases in world production of liquid fuels would end this cycle. But as Skrebowski points out, "If adaptive responses were fast enough and large enough, oil prices might be broadly stable. They clearly are not." By "adaptive responses" he means in part those increases in oil production and the production of substitutes. But, the unstable economic climate we are now facing is making long-term planning and investment in both the oil industry and the alternative energy industries difficult.
everytime. 152+475+411=1038 items in total, times ten=10380, divided by 60=173 minutes just dragging clips in. three hours wasted. Imagine now, if you will, a solution. I realized this solution.
To make the sauce, heat the mirin, soy sauce, worcestershire, agave and vinegar in a small saucepan over medium heat until it comes to a small boil. Reduce the heat and whisk in the palm sugar and xantham gum until dissolved. Remove from the heat and set aside to cool. (It will become thicker as it cools.)
Will the game be tied after 0-0 - Yes: Even (+/-100)
I colored the Chocolate Strawberies with Copic markers:
So you're moving out! It's such a fun new exciting thing, or maybe it's something you've done one hundred times but it's always a hassle. One thing that will make it easier either way is being an organized packer.
Because Anna is so passionate about creating awareness of the positive impact women are currently having on our world, I am excited to announce that she will be here on a monthly basis. I am grateful for Anna’s willingness to take time out of her very full life as a wife, mother, and blogger to commit to sharing her passion for inspiring others
Article 11 of Directive 2004/48 (the ‘Enforcement Directive’) provides that Member States must ensure that rights holders are in a position to apply for an injunction against intermediaries whose services are used by a third party to infringe an IP right, as well as against infringers.
of evasion; and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties
**Let’s check with our pals at the Institute for Policy Studies concerning income ratios of CEOs to workers – in 2010, among the S&P 500, CEOs received an average of $10,762,304 (up almost 28% from 2009) and workers received an average of $33,121 (up all of 3.3% from 2009), for a total ratio of 325:1, so that’s a pretty impressive ungrokkably huge discrepancy. How are they doing in Japan? Well, according to the Nikkei business daily as reported by the Wall Street Journal, in the 2009-2010 fiscal year, their CEOs made approximately 4.8 times as much as their average worker, down from 5.8 the year before. Four-point-eight. If you compare Japanese unemployment rates and US unemployment rates you’ll notice that they follow a very similar pattern, with the meaningful difference that Japan has way lower unemployment. Both countries’ unemployment rates peaked in 2009, with Japan at 5.6% (highest ever) and the US at 10% (highest since 1983). To get the best visual comparison, set both graphs to the same time period, say 1960-2012. Now, I am a responsible econometrician and I’m not saying that reducing this income discrepancy will automatically fix everything. I’m just saying that correlations sometimes exist for a reason and that if people seriously want to mitigate economic implosions maybe they should look more closely at what folks are doing in countries that consider 5% unemployment to be absurdly high.
Full of slacker energy, this music doesn't seem to care about having a clean or cohesive sound, but throws ideas around freely and sounds like some of the most natural indie rock there is. They're always on the edge of excellence here, swinging back and forth from really good to great and mustering up some exiting and memorable melodies here and there within each song. Loose guitar solos rage over the top of consistent drums and a meandering bass. It's noisy, honest, and gloriously wide-ranging. - Matthew Foster
-Picture Frame (choose the size and style that match with your room)
*Glow = Omnipotence
Is she to whimsical?
It all started when Friedrich created miniature shoes to sell in the studio’s gift shop.
I also went on Date #8 just tonight. He seems cool, but is definitely the bad boy type. Tall, muscular, tats. He was very vague about what he does for work, I’m not even sure if he has a job. He mentioned something about cars, but like I said was very vague. I told him I’m a full time gangsta – he told me he is too. Then we had a discussion about who could run what neighbourhood. We negotiated down to the streets who owns which hoods. Was quite entertaining. He definitely made me laugh, and it was probably the most fun I’ve had on any of the dates I’ve been on! Dammit, of course I would like a bad boy (I have a track record).
have a wonderful holiday weekend
Souls weary as droopy-eyed mutts in the sun,
Right now, he's sleeping downstairs.
We just got back from our big Europe trip this weekend! We had an absolutely amazing time. It was so nice for Justin and me to take some time off of work and just relax together. Call me crazy (and/or slightly paranoid), but I didn't want to advertise to everyone that we would be away from our home for over 2 weeks.
Awkward in the parlor, neither a dancer nor elegant,
it’s hard … to watch a lover leave … really hard for me
The kids found and named all the latitude lines on our globe.
Drive?
Not that the Catholic Church itself would care for such uncool ethnicities. Among others, it operates Catholic Charities USA that bills itself as “a professional association and social justice movement” committed to “Racial Equality and Diversity.”
Last week I was approached by the Philadelphia Cream Cheese company asking me to try a new recipe and let them know our thoughts the timing was PERFECT! Seriously they had me at cream cheese!
* Mention the contest on your blog (+ 1 point)
The company is located in Miami, where I live, so I went to visit once before. I had already been told that it would be arranged for me to come see the new 2011 lineup, so wasn't entirely unexpected, but I didn't think it'd be today. It was rather a surprise. Anyway, like the first time, I had a lot of fun. I got to see prototypes of their entire 2011 line (click on any photo for a bigger version):
A dog had followed his owner to school. His owner was a fourth grader at a public elementary school. When the bell rang, the dog sidled inside the building and made it all the way to the child's classroom with him before a teacher noticed him and shoo'ed him back outside and closed the door behind him.
We need to stop inventing and promoting as fact the concept of something being “perfect.” Perfect is a subjective assessment and the term should be avoided whether applying it to theological doctrine, political philosophy or the makeup of a family structure. A family can be defined in many different ways and composed of many different components and does not have to reflect a household where there is a white daddy who is the self-proclaimed master of the universe, a white mommy who is subservient to her husband and lives to serve, bear and raise the two perfectly behaved children and tend to the quintessential family dog named Spots who is often caged on top of the family station wagon and driven down the expressway at high speeds.
These programs include:
The Independent says that it doesn't know if the IEA receives donations from the tobacco industry. Nor do I, and I don't care, but I would hazard a guess that, as a free market think tank, it receives a good deal of money from various industries and that some of these industries may benefit from the government's Red Tape Challenge. Presumably then, Littlewood is not a fit and proper person to discuss the regulation of any industry, particularly since he has "nailed his colours to the mast" by speaking out in favour of free markets.
"Oh yeah. Anytime you see a bald security-guard type, you say, 'He's cute.' You have a thing for bald authority figures."
The mission would not be complete without an intentional “launching” of our children in the mission of God. Ferwerda calls parents to count the cost and realize that “just when all the work is done, and you start getting all comfortable and settled, enjoying the results of your hard work in your amazing, well-built house, you find out that God suddenly wants it back (109).” Our children belong to God, and we must be prepared ourselves as well as preparing our children for “launch.”
Then, one day, talking to a friend we have found out what is going on.
The huge white wall is made from what seems to be concrete blocks and is plastered, but not painted. It surrounds a main house and several smaller buildings.
Now this brings me to a place where we are simplified and the emotional strain of being in the adoption process is gone. For the first time in a long time I have had weeks...not days...but WEEKS of pure joy being a stay at home mother.
This group of Bersih peaceful rally participants were “inside” a restaurant just in front of the entrance of Masjid Jamek and beside the Karyaneka outlet. They were on the first floor of this restaurant, when our thugs came in , behaving worse than all of our gangsters put together ( Geng 18, 36, tiga line, etc etc ). Real Gangsters would come to a “table-talk”. Our PDRM gangsters resort to “table-smash” , “table-break” , “chair-smash” , “screaming-at-the-top-of-their-lungs”.. all just to show – who’s the boss.
6. Wave
You’ve got my TwoCents! Be sure to share your TwoCents, comments, and feedback below!
Andy and I are waiting in the middle of the woods on this nature trail.
Wise parents will plan to provide a few outdoor activities before the child actually leaves for camp, such as picnics in a wooded area, or overnight excursions, sleeping in a tent or camper as a family. While there, be alert for undiscovered allergies to organisms present only in outdoor locations.
Kobe today while shopping.
The parable condemns Caiaphas the chief Shepherd of Israel for his selfish irresponsibility in neglecting the spiritual and material needs of Jews in Israel. Lazarus represents this neglected class. The parable is a further indictment of the Sadducees (who denied the resurrection of the body and were about to reject the miraculous resurrection of Lazarus) in their disbelief of Moses and the prophets. The parable is presented in terms of the popular belief of the Pharisees about the death state.
Then later I was IM’ing with another friend who mentioned that a corp mate sold one of his characters. This is also legal in EVE Online. You can sell a character for ISK. You cannot sell your account however, nor can you sell your character for real world currency under the rules of the game. But transferring a character for ISK is perfectly acceptable and CCP has a process that protects both buyer and seller.
I miss you when I doubt every relationship, every moment, every kiss. I miss you when I find myself looking for lies, for holes in every story. And then when I feel vindicated when I find them. Right, again. Why am I always right?
How to be a dreamy creative AND a conscientious house keeper? I don’t even have kids! What kind of wreck will I be then? What will I have to sacrifice?!! Not my art, SURELY NOT!!!
“Writing a book is a horrible, exhausting struggle, like a long bout with some painful illness. One would never undertake such a thing if one were not driven on by some demon whom one can neither resist nor understand.”
We’re very happy not to hold any smallest baby records. Isaac and Molly were plenty small enough and are some of the earliest surviving 24-weekers, born “way back” in 1991.
I am a slow reader and just recently I have been busy with my work, so I welcomed the fact that yesterday I had to spend five hours on a train. If it is not too noisy, I think a train is the perfect place to read. So yesterday I made some progress through The Science of Dr Who by Paul Parsons. As I said last week, I am a long-term fan of Dr Who, and this book makes me want to watch all the episodes again from scratch because I think I'd look at them with new insight. At the end of each one I could turn to whoever was watching them with me and say something like 'they could do that, you know...'
In the course of this... discussion... I explained that I tend to get irritated quickly but then I get over it whereas he tends to become annoyed by something slowly and then he obsesses about it. And that this irritates me.
Eventually the Occupiers went back to 60 Wall Street for a General (Peoples) Assembly. They have lots and lots of plans. Next up, December 24-25, 2011
Guide you
Pink leather bound journal from Nieman Marcus
Those to the extreme right are heads of corporations who have moved jobs overseas. They have also chosen to trim their number of employees to cut costs and increase profits. On top of that, they have acquired other companies and then turned around and let thousands of workers go because of redundancy – i.e. you do not need two payroll departments, two HR departments and two Benefits departments.
Today I received the sweetest surprise package in the mail from my friend Amy. It was filled with these beautiful vintage spools. There were even some green ones and one in blue and orange! I have never found an orange spool. Can't wait to match it up with a feathered friend! I was so touched by Amy's kindness. I first met her through the Jo Morton Stitchers group. She is a very active group member and has organized many a fun project exchange for us.
Thank you for doing so much to educate people regarding God’s Law. I have learned a great deal from your show, and try to share that knowledge with as many people as I can.
You want to read something terrifying? Read Chapter 9 of Susan Faludi's Backlash: The Undeclared War Against American Women*. It was written TWENTY YEARS AGO, and it reads like Johnny Carson's "Carnac the Magnificent," revealing the punchlines before the joke is read. Except this is no joke. It's terrifyingly, nauseatingly real. The war has not only been declared, it's being won by 7 to 2 votes cast by middle-aged white men.
Get her on her knees
Jessie Boone is a self proclaimed bad boy and doesn’t march to the beat of anyone’s drum, but his own. Growing up in less than desirable circumstances has made him no stranger to the hard knock life and his determination to leave it behind is fierce. When he finds himself transferred to East Franklin High School, he sees his opportunity to use his athletic ability to snag a college football scholarship, but Forbes Henderson, the player Jessie means to replace isn’t giving up his spot willingly. In fact, Forbes is willing to go to extreme measures to retain his place as first string quarterback. When Forbes’ malicious plan to injure his replacement fails, Jessie is furious and determined to show him he messed with the wrong person; not only is he going to take the position of first string quarterback, he’s going to take his girl, too.
Thanks again for hosting Lew this was a fun topic and its always good to bust open the Alaskan Smoked Porter.
to triumph over my flesh's desire
I used the Anda pattern from Burda Style, and changed it a little bit. The neckline turned out a little bit wider than I thought, but it works. And the doilies were from Etsy.
- Those are great shoes. I stole a pair just like that one time.
Well, today was our youngest daughter's birthday.........I cannot believe that she turned 2 today! Where has the time gone?! We celebrated down at grammy's house and what a lovely day it was too.........sunshine, cool breezes, no humidity.......just perfect! Pictures to follow soon!
Me: I don’t know. I just need to shut my mouth at this point, or else.
We praise you Lord.
Why am I bringing this up? Well, this past weekend I caught a break at a local Asian video store. I was walking through it with my son, when my eyes fixed upon a DVD copy of the Japanese television series "The Ancient Dogoo Girl". I picked it up an gave it good look over, no price.
Vidhi
Aravinda and Chinthaka were taking visuals of the Randiva newspaper Editor and journalist entering the CCD building to give their statements when CCD officers detained Aravinda and Chinthaka.
Basic Grey "Pyrus" - Bradford Paper (Scraps)
Beat.
Share the kill later, by all means. But if you want to get rich, trust your judgement when it calls - and leave those whos job it is to manage your business to pick up the pieces They can have the lesser quality bits.
Dead wrong to believe that you were mine,
God does not begin by asking us about our ability, but only about our availability, and if we then prove our dependability, he will increase our capability.
The Slog is still disturbed by the number of Fluffies saying the difference can be made up in terms of tax increases. But any distance we wander down that road really would see off what’s left of economic growth – and produce a slump. If we could distinguish between those consumers buying imports or Brit-made stuff, that’d be fine. But there’s not enough home-made stuff for consumers to buy any more; and then there’s that small problem called the EU, which forbids trade barriers.
When I went to see David Cross at The Paramount...when was it...last winter? Spring? Anyway, when I went to see him, he showed the audience the first five minutes of the first episode of the creatively and totally accurately titled series he'd just completed filming, "The Increasingly Poor Decisions of Todd Margaret." Those first five minutes nearly made me pee my pants (mostly because Will Arnett fucking CHEWS UP the dialogue and spits it out like a rancid sunflower seed), so I was SUPER excited for this thing to come out.
you wish to wake
- Monogram canvas with natural leather trim
How could I deny him this pleasure?
What's the harm?
"I thought I heard someone screaming." He chuckled. "You know maybe this is their dream. Maybe neither of us exist. Perhaps we're both characters in their dream."
To cut a long-story short, I managed my way into the inhouse (or is it in-airport?!) bookstore, and the first book that caught my eye also happened to be the one I bought – The Outliers by Malcolm Gladwell. It had been recommended a few times on some LinkedIn forums and by some of my peers; plus having read Malcolm’s earlier work ‘The Tipping Point’ in 2011, it seemed like a good enough choice.
I would recommend Between the Acts, but would caution that in order to fully feel and understand the story you have to appreciate the period and setting and consider the impact they have. It is the time and setting which determine the plot of Between the Acts and not the characters. They, as Shakespeare wrote, are merely players being prodded and moulded until they play their roles without question or complaint.
Are you sure I can't have a part next year?
So FINALLY they save Jason and Mo takes them all to go see an old army buddy of his who owns some radio station or something, I guess. The army buddy is played by Paul Sorvino, who had some roles in minor movies like Goodfellas, but also in CLASSICS like Repo the Genetic Opera! Splendid!
It's just a wee card using up the tiniest strips of leftover papers - you might recognise them from the scrapbook layout - Spring Lambs - posted earlier this month, with a minuscule snippet from my much-treasured Graphic45 pad, Le Romantique, that I just could not bring myself to throw away.
Still pass the hours; carts laden with hay and straw begin to arrive from the country ; a coffee stall makes its welcome appearance at the corner of the street; pale, sleepy featured operatives walk, with languid steps, in the direction of the City; jaded cab drivers urge their still more jaded horses towards the stables; water cress girls hurry along with their empty baskets; milk men wait at street corners for the dairy vans; while worn out, dusty journeymen bakers sleepily grope their way to the lodgings where they eke out their existence. The gaslights become paler and paler, the street seems more animated, the coffee stall is surrounded by an eager throng of customers, and the first, thin narrow streaks of light in the horizon become larger and, broader as we wend our homeward way, tired, but not uninterested, by our night in Whitechapel.
Honour the Shrine is Clifford's debut novel, a taught, first-person World War II tale centring on a British mission to blow up a bridge in Japanese-occupied Burma; the reason I picked it up (for a pittance, it has to be said) was because of a comment Book Glutton left on this post about Ross Thomas' Spy in the Vodka (a.k.a. The Cold War Swap), the back cover of which has a raft of glowing review quotes for Clifford's 1966 novel The Naked Runner (also published by Hodder, Thomas' UK publisher at the time). Slightly counterintuitively, though, rather than buy The Naked Runner, I bought Cifford's first book instead, mostly because it happened to float past my eyes on eBay. However, The Naked Runner does look like a cracker – certainly better than the supposedly rubbish Frank Sinatra-starring film it was turned into in 1967 – so I'll be returning to it in the not-too-distant future...
All this fresh blog loveliness has had me thinking about transformations. I've always been drawn to the caterpillar-to-butterfly story. Something about that chubby, sweet looking caterpillar inching along - munching whatever bright green leaves she can get her hands on... limited by lack of speed on her very short legs. She is completely focused on the leaf she's on. Chomp chomp chomp. Taking care of business. Then she instinctively knows it's time to wrap herself up and get to work on the radical stuff of changing her whole self!
Last time, I talked about the need to talk in our relationships and specifically, to ask your partner what they need. In my case, I got the rather vague answer of "I want to be appreciated more".
For those who watched the stock market action during April, we saw some interesting days. On a number of occasions, we saw the market “mixed” – the Dow may have been up, but the NASDAQ down or the S&P down and the NASDAQ up. If these indices are measuring our market, why the differences?
Thank you to everyone for your comments and emails full of good wishes and concern. I hope any of you who were visited by Irene came through as well as I did.
So, I cut my teeth on epic fantasy – Tolkien and Terry Brooks and LOTR and Willow. As a writer, I now have my award-winning “Guardians of Light” fantasy romance series for Samhain. Reviewers have taken notice. I hope you’ll check it out.
(PLEASE ONLY ADD BLOG, CDAC, or SCS LINKS. THANK YOU)
First of all, I'm alive! Just barely. I've been sick for two weeks and seriously, how much nose "stuff" can one have in one's body? Blech! I'm feeling a little more human though.
Coffee Glaze
Santorum: I would issue an Executive Order
We ordered beverages and made a toast to Mamma Ginny’s offspring as she begins a new phase in her Castmember life in, well, the United Kingdom (the “real” one that is…).
Would it not be fitting if this was the year that the Colts reached for that place deep within their souls, and won one for all the good guys?
And yet, this summer especially the garden has held me ransom. The hours I've spent seeing to our flowers, the tomato plants (they're heavy with tomatoes now, I don't know what to do with them. I don't even like tomatoes!), reading, sitting in the sunshine, snatching it when I can. And time, being so precious this year, as it was last year, nudges me further into obsession. This year more than any year I've felt almost driven to soak up as much of what passes for fresh air round here, earlier in the summer I sat out as long as I could until our solar lights came on, lighting up the garden path like a runway (Santa stop here!)
That pleases me to no end.
Take me, Jesus, take me now.
There were several hills, and for the most part, I did well with footing. Only tripped once and a half. I took my time going up and down the super steep parts and over the creek since I could feel my ankles and back getting tired and unstable. Suddenly, we were .2 miles from the finish and back to civilization. (Actually, the trail park is right in the middle of town. It just winds all around a square mile area. It’s super close to my house, and I had no idea it was even there.)
*Freebies are posted below...
4. Stand Out From The Crowd – The world despises a cheap imitation and loves an original. Conformity to the norm will merely sentence you to mediocrity, obsolescence, and irrelevance. Everyone has unique gifts and talents, and the earlier you discover and develop yours the better off you’ll be. Build your personal brand, become a subject matter expert, and guard your reputation. Everyone has a personal brand – the question is will it be built by default or by design. Everything you do should enhance and reinforce your story.
Hello Everyone…. Time for more Fish Porn… Some new, some old, some very old.. but great pictures none the less…..
KYRA SEDGWICK / Dept. Chief Brenda Leigh Johnson – “THE CLOSER” (TNT)
I try my best to make sure the boys are eating healthy well balanced meals. Then again, some nights the lazy part of me takes over and I think “Hmm…how about the drive through?” This should translate into an easy, stress free meal, but then again, I have kids.
“Let’s go.” He playfully pulled her into the garage, and flipped on the light. Riley gasped as she felt her heart plummet toward her feet.
so we can arrange to get your prize out to you
funny
Iran Is Not The Only Issue Netanyahu’s New Coalition Will Have To Address How Arafat died Egyptian presidential race wide open Busted: Haniyeh admits Hamas won’t retaliate for Israeli strike on Iran Toronto Muslim School Issues Phony “Apology” for Teaching Jew-Hatred Freedom of expression, Palestinan Journalists Syndicate-style Meridor shoots his mouth off В Сирии убиты британские, французские и бельгийские бойцы
“All in a night’s work. I’m not even going to make you tip me.” Tanya sashayed away, whistling, the tartan switching left, right, left, right in a betwitching rhythm as old as mammal-kind.
02/03/2012 BUY 0.01 eurcad 1.30512 02/07/2012 1.31267 +7.50
Clothing for the Clothing drive can be dropped off in room 126.
“Percy Jackson isn’t expecting freshman orientation to be any fun. But when a mysterious mortal acquaintance appears on campus, followed by demon cheerleaders, things quickly move from bad to worse.
Why climb’st thou not the Mount Delectable,
Republica will be on The Main Stage on Saturday 14th July. Famous for tracks such as “Ready to Go”, “From Rush Hour With Love”, and “Drop Dead Gorgeous”, the band describe their sound as techno-pop punk rock and are one of the most memorable of a wave of female fronted rock bands to emerge in the 1990s.
The movie highlights the worldview’s irrationality of racism. Although the heart wrenching identity-crisis is portrayed in good taste and with sympathy, the powerful emotions involved in this movie play cunningly on the audience’s feelings, and acts as a stark warning that South Africans and the so-called ‘civilized’ world must never allow that cruel, heartless, racist system called “Apartheid” to raise its draconian head ever again, and neither should anyone dare speak good of it either!
Every other tea growing country has a very cheap labor source. Other countries pay the workers $3.00 a week to harvest the tea. That won't quite work here in the States, so this tea plantation invented their own mechanized system to harvest the tea. They used parts of a cotton picker among other things to make this machine that appears to roll over the bushes while picking the top layer of leaves and blowing them into the collection, or hopper area. The tour included the greenhouse where propagation takes place, the fields, irrigation ponds etc. We also had a tour of the factory where the tea leaves are processed into tea. It really was fascinating, and.... we got to sample lots of tea, iced and hot! The gift shop is new, and very nice. Of course we bought some tea, I chose Plantation Peach and Green Mint while our son selected the Charleston Breakfast tea
“We are people of faith, and we want an end to war, and we believe that NATO — which is meeting here in the coming week — is fomenting war, and creating new wars,” one of the protesters said.
LAST CALL for Abstract Submission
To my gaiety, a few long grey hairs
Looked down where He lay
We hasten to say, in a moment, the Christian Endeavor people were involved in temperance, and other issues, and there is no particular indication that their Christian service work primarily for their churches led them into the arena of curing drunks. Hence the emphasis in the foregoing quotation from Rev. Clark is to “helplessness” due to stress, not the helplessness that causes one to turn to God for help in overcoming alcoholism. That is not to say, however, that Christian Endeavor people did not consider it possible:
ard them as the new orthodoxy and, given a little time, all but the evangelical Luddites will catch up. But where does that leave those with serious biblical questions about these worship styles? Can two walk together unless they are agreed? If we cannot pray together how can we work together, since prayer is itself the essence of our work? Co- operating in evangelism, in youth work, in leadership training, all these happen in the context ofcorporate worship. Without a sense ofproportion about these very fundamental questions, further separation between gospel churches at different points on this spectrum seems inescapable.
One of my new favorite apps is neu.Annotate PDF - also the best price around, FREE. This handy app allows students to annotate PDFs with drawings, stamps and photos. It has a palm guard to recognize students' palms if they rest their hands on the glass and is incredibly easy to use. Imagine uploading a form, PDF version of your workbooks, PDF version of your worksheet, etc. and having your students use this application to complete it? Imagine all the paper you can save!
Peregrine falcons can be seen at a couple of locations in the county but are easiest to spot sitting on Nottingham Trent University’s Newton building in the centre of Nottingham. As I mentioned previously, larger birds such as the osprey can be seen on migration along theTrent Valley. Even the red kite, once so near to extinction, can occasionally be seen.
"Where are you going, exactly?" I asked.
Time For A Change: This is the first knmown live performance of this song by
Uptown girls - Stamping Bella
Do you remember when people used to say “thank goodness”?
useful.
Alexander Pushkin is a famous Russian poet but he wrote prose as well. “The Squire’s Daughter” is one of his stories, the most touching, romatic, funny, light and young. And very Russian.
It was an honour to write about one of my absolute favourite jewellery designers and her amazing collections, which always surprise.
Telenstil and Gytha both turned to look at the small old man. He placed his hands together and bowed deeply at the waist.
The nation’s rising rate of obesity has been well-chronicled. But businesses, governments and individuals are only now coming to grips with the costs of those extra pounds, many of which are even greater than believed only a few years ago: The additional medical spending due to obesity is double previous estimates and exceeds even those of smoking, a new study shows.
Anyway, after getting back into something I loved so much as a kid, I realized nobody was doing an adult version of Masters in any form. It’s like everyone grew up except He-Man. What the fuck? I want to see him slice up bitches with his power sword, baby! So I took it upon myself to write a nice brutal script that I titled “Eternia: Dark Days”. But wait, I can’t draw. Enter Julio Estrada, a fellow Masters fan and artist extraordinaire.
A balance of the spiritual and the intellectual is represented by the allusion to air, sky and water – the freedom of the spirit married to the rationality of the mind; the vision of the artist to the knowledge of the scientist. Both in interior and exterior setting this blue has an important role to play. It complements perfectly the contemporary materials and modern neutrality of glass, steel and concrete, but also works with stronger and more traditional interior shades such as crimson, burgundy, plum, teal, pewter and gold.
Now butter a shallow casserole, to stop your pudding sticking.
(Please note that buckets will not be provided by the management; be sure to bring your own.)
Sent Anna off to school,
Madness Night boat to Cairo UK
I'm afraid, however, that although we had read different versions, not one of us present found it captivating or agreed with him about the magical quality of the writing, although we all agreed with his vivid description of seeming to view it all through the bottom of a glass. Every one of us found the prose contorted and imprecise, a shock to us after The Great Gatsby which we had loved and admired, and a reflection, presumably, of the contortions and changes of direction Fitzgerald had gone through in the writing.
Yep, that means I have a boyfriend.
According to Deuteronomy 4:2 and Revelation 20:18-19 (symbolic bookends of the scriptures) we are not to hold anyone hostage over anything we have tried to add to the scriptures. We cannot add some tradition then claim it to be heresy if someone doesn’t follow that tradition. We also cannot take the scriptures and cut away the things we don’t believe in. There are at least six different places throughout the scriptures where this warning is given.
“The Domestic Trade and Consumer Affairs Ministry should also increase monitoring and efforts to educate the public on consumer rights,” he said.
XMRV is a type of MULV.
i'm happy that i'm blessed
Pool of tears and faith lost
Celly also provides security and privacy as phone numbers are never exposed and there are controls. Cell curators filter messages before they are sent to the group. This keeps discussion on-topic and reduces abuse, impersonation, and cyberbullying. An @me feature lends itself to note taking. Celly even has a built-in polling feature complete with the tabulation of results.
Production company Allied Forces
78. You look like the type of girl that has heard every line in the book, so what’s one more?
Houseago likes to unify different visions, but rarely does he do it as seamlessly as he does in Rattlesnake Figure. What’s even more impressive is that this isn’t the entire story of this piece. When encountering the work, I challenge the viewer to determine the back of the sculpture from the front. After close looking, I failed in my attempt. Glutes easily turn into thigh muscles, the directional force of the legs and body is difficult to determine, the face carving and drawing is a collection of mis-directions and false clues. Here we have a Picasso/Rodin shattering of figuration, a sculpture that is a whole figure with a take on sculptural essence in a traditional sense, yet a work that cannot be pinned down as an “image” or embodiment of any one thing. Even as Houseago invokes the Germans and Renaissance Platonists, he undermines them. He shows he is a Picasso man at heart. He’ll meditate on a self and then explode it to pieces.
When I ride my bike to work I fly down Ingersoll. On the way home, I take it slow. But whenever I pass this one bar, I ring my bell and get a cheer from the smokers standing outside. One night when I drove by I decided to stop and check out a cool car out front, so I didn’t ring the bell. As I slowed down, I heard a guy shout “What? No ring, ring?” I smiled thinking “she connects.”
So often, we forget that our jobs, our families, our ministries, our relationships, our everything depend not on our ability, but on God’s power.
Over the years I've been a sucker for many of those American big budget, slick multi-part continuing series... 24, The Wire, Heroes, Dexter, The Mentalist and Prison Break are just some of the titles that have come and gone at Piley Towers over the years. However these days I'm reluctant to get drawn in, with the addition of Piley Jr, there just doesn't seem to be the time anymore, and I struggle to commit myself to 24 or 26 hour long episodes season after season. I'm still saddled with LOST which is absolute pants now. The trouble is, having invested so much time into it (to date, 103 hours that I'll not be getting back), that I've got to see it through now to the conclusion... just to find out if there really is an ending or it was just 6 series of absolute bollocks. LOST has become a real millstone, and with that in mind I kinda promised myself that I wouldn't get involved anymore. But back in the summer I picked up on all the buzz going around about the HBO vampire series True Blood, and rather reluctantly gave it a go. After a slow start (which to be fair was just some great scene setting and character building) this series exploded into without doubt the most enjoyable debut series I've ever seen.... and as an extra bonus it was only 12 episodes long!
441229 All other motor vehicle dealers
The United States also said the budget is transitional and will need to be revised at the next General Assemblies in six months to reflect agreed recommendations related to the WIPO Development Agenda, the PCT fee reduction, and decisions relating to staffing.
That 1964 book was, perhaps, inspired in part by an adventure in reportage commissioned by legendary Mad magazine creator, Harvey Kurtzman. For the April 1961 issue of the humour magazine, Help!, editor Kurtzman sent "our agents, Susan Perl (famous artist) and X9 Steinem (assistant editor)" on a mission "to invade the Fifth Avenue headquarters of a famous international beauty ring... and record its secret rites."
14. i don't ever ever ever need to drink to have a good time or to be able to get out on a dance floor!
Alexander finds Burchard at work somewhere in the Vatican and asks him about the advice he was recently asked for. Burchard says that, as an expert in canon law, when he’s asked for a judgment he must provide it. Alexander sits beside him and asks for his opinion on the expansion of the College of Cardinals. Burchard says the pope can appoint as many as he likes. Alexander asks how many he’d need to appoint to make his papacy safe. Burchard reluctantly tells him it would take about 13. What a fortuitous number. Burchard says that such a large number would require a precedent. Alexander orders him to find one.
Again, I’m far too late to have prevented this, but on paper, we all love the ease of use, the accessibility and the huge selection that Netflix and the like have to offer. In practice, however, there are no more movie stores and I miss browsing. And fuck Redbox too, especially since the one at Shaw’s was busted tonight.
I came to the conclusion that it will only get overall better. I continue to study voiceover technique and strive to get better. And I’m working on fostering a steady stream of craft services as well. It certainly takes discipline to stay on track I’m finding out. I find myself making good use of all my iPod organisational and motivational apps to keep on top of things and stay accountable to myself and others.
Why else do we see music magazines throwing together collections of all their covers throughout the last thirty years, or movie magazines listing “The 100 Greatest Movies Ever Made”? Face it, folks–creativity is just a lot of hard work.
Christ. McKendrick’s steaming again. Slumped in the street with his bottle in a bag.
Bought him the car that he drives
This last picture is of a 17th century sleeping bag. It’s all leather and just rolls up to go behind a saddle. Didn’t look that big, but I guess people used to be shorter.
There was once a book. It was nicely bound, very attractive book. Many people saw it looked nice and the storyline was nice. It was owned by the library under the reference section, so you could only read The Book there, you couldn’t take it home or own it, but you could enjoy it.
Did I mention that I'm tired? I want to write the stories in my head and don't have the time. I have a beautiful story I wrote...I want to share it with the world and don't have the time. I taught until 8:00 last night and then put in another 3.5 hours to finish off the drafts of three documents and delivered them. Got home to find...well, never mind. I wanted to sleep. And if I'm complaining...it's winter and I was really cold!
“They’ll go somewhere to get help. And if it works, they’ll be rewarded and they’ll go to a better place,” said David.
Myristyls – See Myristic Acid.
It was now night-time. Jenny had given the kids their bath while Vince scrubbed away at the dishes. He didn’t mind doing the dishes, it was the folding clothes he loathed. It seemed strange to him that he would hate folding clothes so much, but for some reason it just got under his skin.
For "Hitchcock", read "History".
Well never mind, we all are that
Hard drive: 2.5-inch HDD (5400 rpm) up to 500 GB
I ate until I could eat no more, finally stopping, not because I was full, but because there was nothing left to eat. I ate…everything.
Round one: Starks takes the center of the cage and probes with a jab. Both men are hesitant early and Starks has landed a few right hands. Jacoby hits Starks with a right of his own. Starks tags Jacoby with a nice right hand that snaps his head back as both men continue to size each other up. Starks finds another home for the right hand and he’s not using his wrestling at all yet. Jacoby connects with a looping left as Starks is on the way in and Starks responds with a right to the body. Either man can win this round if they do something big in the last minute. Jacoby closes the distance and Starks drops for a takedown, advancing to half guard while Jacoby latches on a Kimura as the round ends. 10-9 Starks
8s-
There are pins in my skin and fingers around my throat
A diminutive crucifix of antiqued pewter is forever bound with weathered solder, tinted the hues of rusted iron, to a slender bottle of antique glass. The century old glass is veiled in an earthy patina created while hidden away within the earth for decades.
So really, yes, we've been blessed in health matters. I was reminded of that fully at that walk. My heart wept for the parents who have been told "I'm afraid it's cancer" and cheered the bravery of the children who fight each day for life. There was one special shirt that caught my eye. I asked the wearer if I could take a picture of it, but don't feel right about posting it because she was a child. Instead I'll just share what it said.
According to the logic of proposing interracial mixing as an evolutionary solution, amalgamating all the different cat and dog breeds into single homogenised moggs and mutts, with all the irritating weaknesses and hair loss problems bred out, would be for the betterment of both species. It would certainly make the process of choosing pets less complicated, albeit perhaps a little less interesting.
«Christina» AW2007
Shrimp fra diavolo might be my favorite Italian meal of all time. Shrimp are coated in olive oil and crushed red pepper before a fragrant mix of tomatoes, onions, white wine, and basil simmer down to a perfect sauce for coating pasta. You can opt to forget the pasta and serve this with a beautiful loaf of crusty bread. Heck, have both. But trust me, you’ll need a means to get the sauce out of the bottom of your bowl. Licking it works too.
The R18 will instead make its first public track appearance at the reinstated Le Mans test day on April 24, its maiden competitive debut following shortly after at the 6H Spa on May 8, 2011.
Muni’s next film “Seven Faces” had him playing a total of 7 different characters and was designed to capitalize on his mastery of makeup and characterizations but in Muni’s own words it just meant that “I can be 7 times as bad as usual”. He played Don Juan, Napoleon, Franz Schubert and even a Negro boxer! thanks in no small part to the market crash of 29 the film did not fare well. Fox wanted him to play a supporting role in his next film so he decided to leave Hollywood all together and go back to New York. He appeared in a number of plays before receiving a visit from a certain mister Howard Hawks...
And you know what? I tried to make the most of it, I really did. I showed up on time and didn't run away when he went to go buy the tickets. (The thought did enter my mind, don't get me wrong.) He suggested that we pre-game at the local watering hole, and of course I was all about that. A little beer goes a long way. Women have beer goggles too! We go into the bar, sit down and order a drink when he drops a bomb on me...
39, Rue des Martyrs
At a news conference Wednesday, current and former Turner Industries workers showed examples of harassment.
There really isn't a recipe, because seriously - use your imagination and do whatever you want with it! Switch the sauce from plain marinara, try different cheeses, put unique toppings - be inventive!
Keep Stamping,
According to Shenzhen Media People’s Court Apple lost its trademark ownership on December 6, 2011, see Huang Mengren's article here. Apple decided to appeal at the Guangdong Higher People's Court.
I am Iooking forward to hearing from you. Bless-up, you are truly extremely stunning & beautiful to look at … xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx”
The game went as simple as advancing, some shooting here and there, and then the smashing, however untimely, charge of the Man-o-War + Butcher to decimate the enemy Destroyer without even popping the feat. Of course too much trust in the wreck marker and the Butcher himself let my gf charge him with the Jug who completely wasted him. Oh yes, the man is not immortal after all.
Originality – I’d love to see more truly original picture book concepts! There are lots of well-worn story ideas out there, and I’d encourage writers to read, read, read to learn what has, and hasn’t been done before.
you just give them their space, and hope they don’t
The past two weeks, instead of doing my never-ending assignments, I’ve been going to the pet shop in Melbourne Central to waste time aww-ing at the cute animals. Speaking of which, a dog got stolen from there two weeks ago! And the police has released a picture of the stolen dog’s sibling (who looks the same), in hopes of people spotting the stolen dog and reporting it………… Wtf. How do they suppose people would recognise that exact same dog… Ahh, it is things like these that make my day. I know it sucks for the shop owner, but it’s so ridiculous that it made me laugh. You can read the article too and see the picture for yourself here.
Follow the action. Kids or whoever you're with are doing things. Capture the moment of what they're doing rather than when they're sitting and smiling at you. Those are when you can get the good moments. It's in the details when you can get away with some of the depth of field changes. You can also do this with your point and shoot with the portrait setting. You can force it later with editing, too. When you start to anticipate, you will take better photos.
CC had another court appearance a couple of weeks ago. This was for a city traffic ticket for speeding (CC can either write campus citations or city citations.)
I very rarely actually get to cook for myself these days, what with the Geej and all, so when I DO actually get to eat food that isn't Geej leftovers (Are you gonna eat that last bite of banana? Cool. Can I have it?), it's usually of the frozen/microwave variety. So now, an homage to the stuff that sustains me. In no particular order, I dig:
Flopsy: Huh..I can read the signature, but the rest of it is just probably doodling…let’s use these things to build a bonfire…
Our varied membership includes psychiatrists, forensic psychologists, professional clinical counselors, academic researchers, educators, lawyers, psychiatric survivors, concerned family members, other mental health professionals, and advocates from around the world. ISEPP is an independent organization which currently takes no monies from external sources and is run completely by volunteer members.
* Please remember that judging contests is never easy! Our judges have agreed to stay anonymous and are not allowed to “Like” or comment under ANY photographs. Our judges will remain anonymous amongst one another as well as to the Little Diva Tutus fan page/Twitter Page and Blog. Judges decisions are final.
In 1633, De Paul and one of the Ladies, Louise de Marillac, herself a future saint, founded the Company of the Daughters of Charity of St. Vincent De Paul, Servants of the Poor, with a mission of serving “the poorest of the poor.” De Paul died in 1660, was canonized in 1737, and in 1885 was declared patron of all charitable causes resulting from his works, by Pope Leo XIII.
However, some things bothered me. From my London viewpoint, the YA world felt a little stacked against me (although not nearly as much as it is stacked against writers from most of the rest of the world).
46. True Life Blues
You can read all about these projects here. Amanda is doing a giveaway at her blog (go enter, quick!), but I thought I would do one here, too :). If you would like to win this collection of vintage and new/handmade items, just leave a comment:
Time parts the hearts of men -’
And I want to pester Laury ‘bout their freckled hired hand,
I have to remember that I cherish the process of capturing a moment. Like a slip of perfection in a single second, now eternal. I love taking my photos and editing them, bringing out the hues and colors, the hidden loveliness. With luck and a little patience, the more I take the more I will improve. But improvement in and of itself along with the chase for perfection is not necessarily needed to find joy behind the lens.
Peggy goes back to my assisted-living days, when she was our Executive Director. Lucky for me, and I might add with some surprise, after we both retired we kept in touch, meeting for lunch once a month. Somewhere in there, she, who had been widowed, married Bob, who had been single for years after his divorce, with two grown children. I had the good fortune of attending their wedding 7 years ago and ever since, it's been a delightful acquaintance. Peggy often was my confidant when I needed a listening ear and both have been there for Astrid and me from the get-go, supporting us and waving us on to victory, sometimes before anyone else was able.
There were no hiccups along the way, other than the new element was a bit more efficient than the old one, which I guess should have been expected on the first brew. As a result I boiled off a bit more than planned and ended up slightly short on volume and a tad high on gravity. I couldn't be arsed to liquor back, so left it as it was.
The elites treat us as enemy and scapegoat us when the multi-racial dream falters. The hysterical reports blaming Ulster people for the disputes with Roma gypsies is a classic example. The media never told us what caused the dispute but just accused local people of “racist attacks.” Well, I don’t believe them. I think these people were defending their communities.
Sift the flour, baking powder and salt into a second large bowl and make a well in the center. Pour the pumpkin mixture into the well and stir all together with a wooden spoon until smooth.
~Thane Yost
29-What is the most important lesson life has taught you?
Barossa Valley
If the focus is shifted to the importance of being sustainable, rather than on climate change per se, will that promote climate-mitigation behaviours as a happy by-product of sustainability? There is still quite a lot of reluctance for people to accept climate change and the effects it will have on the world around us. But if we could spin it in terms of sustainability, would that get more people on board to reduce their footprints?
Dear Father, I thank You for freeing me from hate, fear, and rage, one day at a time. Help me love others today with the love You have given me. May my behavior and speech reflect that love at every moment, and keep me from clouding the reflection of Your grace with my pride.
This is true. They are different things, just like schooling and parenting are different things. I found it interesting that this was the title and theme of her post, because my post did not have to do with defining unschooling or showing anyone the "right way" to do it. In fact, I only mentioned the word to say how I was lead to my current philosophy after reading about radical unschooling, which is significantly different from simply unschooling (literally just "opting out of school").
2011 Mission: Lifeline Award Level Hospitals
For myself, I have always taken this to be a logical outgrowth of modern survivalisms predecessor's (retreatism as it was then referred to) concern about nuclear bombs being dropped from bombers and relatively unsophisticated ballistic missiles onto our large cities. It was the modernized version of the WW2 bombing campaigns- with the Hiroshima and Nagasaki bombs being viewed as the both the ultimate culmination of a trend, and the start of a new one.
A lot of food in New York is authentic ethnic cuisine, even at the lowest prices - something virtually impossible to find outside the city. We have tremendous selection.
I have mentioned before my love of free beer, how it colours my view of humanity as a fundamentality decent species and of society as a benevolent structure, but the pleasure when someone sends you some is hard to measure. I pondered for a while the possibility of a conspiracy. That brewers of Pongy Ale might not like the Campaign for Greater Cooking Lager Appreciation and how they might be trying to convert me to pongy ale. If so, keep it up. I can live with it as I really rather like pongy ale. In the box were a couple of lagers, some ales and a few really quite odd ones it will be fascinating to try. I still like cheap lout, though, my first true love. I pondered the possibility of a conspiracy manifesting itself in a more malevolent manner if the benevolence of the free pongy ale strategy fails. After all, in order to receive free grog you have to give up your anonymity. With each sample I receive a greater chance of the militant wing of the ale jihadists finding my garage full of cheap Carling, Fosters & Carlsberg and burning it down. But for free beer, it worth the risk. For those that question the point and purpose of beer blogging, there is one clear and unambiguous answer. Nice people send you free beer.
blessed.
So you could open one that leads you to the perfect road
Well I really don't have anything to show, however I am crafting again!! Yipee, having finally got access to my craft room through the mess (thank you xx) I might have something to show soon!
The Lily Bee alphabet was perfect for my long title and the wood banner really finished the page. Finally, I punched some small hears from Victorian paper (Crate Paper) and popped them for interest.
+ another 3 sachets vanilla sugar for dusting
the line was long, the afternoon pleasant so we gabbed our way through the line
and care for you,
Allen also offers political advice for those who want to protect recent investments in community corrections:
Fatigue is what a person feels after a hard work day or an intense session at the gym. It is a gentle tiredness that makes the back ache slightly and the eyelids a little heavy. It is cured by a nap or a reviving espresso. Collingridge was beyond bedridden. She was crippled by incessant agony and dependent on morphine. She was fed through a tube and her body couldn't cope with noise, light or movement. She was doubly incontinent and experienced periods of both blindness and paralysis.
The American people expect this government to protect our constitutional liberties and, at the same time, make sure we understand what the terrorists are trying to do. The 9/11 Commission recommended that the government be robust in tracing money. If you want to figure out what the terrorists are doing, you try to follow their money. And that’s exactly what we’re doing. And the fact that a newspaper disclosed it makes it harder to win this war on terror.
I expect another hot distance race with Mo Farah trying to upgrade from silver to gold in the 5000 meters against a field that once again contains a strong contingent of Kenyan and Ethiopian athletes, and evergreen American Bernard Lagat.
Put yet another way: Though I have arrived at the point where I can't wait to leave Paris, I don't exactly want to leave Paris behind.
Well, was planning to document a little more of the pregnancy process today but my baby is giggling at me and my 4 yr old wants a new movie in since it's raining and he's going stir crazy. Will try to come back soon.
xoxoxoxoxo
We also had 2 new additions to the farm this past Saturday. Baerli blessed us with twins! A buck and a doe! The little buck looks just like his sire. She had them easy too. I had been out at about 8 that morning to milk and noticed that her ligaments were gone. I'd heard/read that first-timers usually had long labors so I went into the house. We unpacked some more boxes for a few hours and the next thing I knew it was 11. So I went out to check on her and the babies were already out and dried off and the buck was running around! I'm glad that she didn't need my help - that's a good sign, I like easy kidders - but so much for documenting it!
Huston, Texas – We all probably remember the case about Andrea Yates, the women who drowned her 5 children. In 1999, Yates suffered from a nervous breakdown, which resulted in two suicide attempts she was then diagnosed with postpartum psychosis. On June 20, 2001, she began to drown her children one by one. What the media fails to explain is that she was treated with a multitude of psychiatric treatments and was still on those drugs at the time of the murder.
In early times we read of the one Church of God, and its adherents called themselves Christians, or, more specifically Orthodox Christians, especially when living in areas where there were many Gnostic heretics who also claimed to be Christian. The Faith given by Christ and upheld by Orthodox Christians was thus from and early time called the Orthodox Faith, signifying right belief and correctly giving glory to God. To convey that this Church was universal and bore the completeness of Christ, it was, again from the earliest times, also called the “whole” or “Catholic” Church (from the Greek word Katholikos: literally “in accord with the whole”). But soon other groups, such as the Arians, and the Donatists or Cathari, would also call themselves “The Catholic and Apostolic Church,” claiming to be the “true Catholics” or “pure Catholics.” Thus the Church even more heavily employed the term Orthodox to distinguish it from the heretics and schismatics who left the Church for doctrines and practices not handed down from the Apostles, but never ceased to continue to utilize the terms Catholic and Apostolic. In centuries following, many nations would also come to Christ, the largest conversion in the history of Christendom being that of the northern lands of Kyivan Rus, which today is known as Ukraine (or Rus-Ukraine), and would spread Christianity northward and eastward in the various Rusyn peoples, which today may find themselves more specifically as Ukrainians, Russians, Ruthenians, Poles, Slovakians, Czech, and Belorus.
confused, and stiff, that
17. The Express
1. Green Shirt- Elvis Costello and the Attractions
He just finished by talking about the greatness of America. Mr. President, you don't have to remind us of how great we are. I just wish you really believed the words that were coming out of your mouth, because I sure don't.
CATHOLIC and Protestant children should be educated together, Mr Robinson says.
Based off of the personalities that you created for them, the characters have the freedom to choose what they want to do next. The benefit of this is that these characters become stronger and more developed but if you give them too much freedom, they and your novel will self destruct. Believe me, I’ve been there. The other day I was reading a blog post about an author who was allowing her protagonist to do what he wanted to do. Okay so far, right? Well, apparently, she gave him slightly too much freedom and he wandered away from her original plot and she thoughtlessly went along with it until her protagonist wound up in a high security prison with concrete floors, an amplitude of armed guards and no foreseeable escape. Now I cannot imagine what the author can do from there, but if you give your character the freedom of thinking or themselves, be sure to enforce some law on your protagonist and do not let him or her stray from the original plot as it could destroy your novel. So if George decides that he wants to hide under a desk and allow the antagonists to kill his friends, well, George is an idiot and you must force him to stand up and fight, no matter how much he remonstrates.
He said it was a little strange to be talking about it, because the fight is ongoing and, while everyone in his building is gone, others in the footprint are still fighting.
Where is the Life we have lost in living?
Cancel Christmas ... Hallmark Channel ... 6 PM
Preheat oven to 350F. Grease a 12 cup muffin pan or line with paper muffin liners. In a large bowl sift together flour, sugar, brown sugar, baking powder, salt, and cinnamon.
The reason why I like this as a small group activity is that it is impossible for the children to copy each other's equations! They HAD to think for themselves and write their own equations. It really was a wonderful activity! As a follow up, the children then flipped their dry erase sleeves over and did the worksheet that corresponded to their own monster. Later on, I gave the children an opportunity to do the worksheets again with crayons, with plenty of time to color them as they liked, since this was such a favorite activity.
It's name starts with the letter 'I'.
when night was come
Jesus came to free us from the bondage of law for the law’s sake. Jesus came to teach us to liberate our minds and hearts. We are slaves no longer. Jesus came to unify the people of the world, not just one group of people, but all people.
Is your writer’s block real, or are you just giving a name to the manifestation of a few other things that are getting in your way? Worth a look…
Ich: *weeping* what is wrong with me.
“Of course you did. Next?”
#15-Jenn Zebb Did win a Digi!!!
Come on down to the Workshop which is based at the Greyville Racecourse. Doors for registration open at 8:00 and Demo's and Workshops start from 09:00. The Entrance fee is R85,00 if you're not having lunch. Wrap for You will be doing FREE demos. The next demo will be on Friday from 15h00 - 15h45. On Saturday, Wrap for You will be doing demos from 09:00 until 13:00 teaching Gift Wrap Techniques and a seperate demo on Ribbon tying for Gift Wrapping.
This soul is much older than it seems.
“So Daniel, what has changed in your life that has you looking for alternate ways to make income?” (i.e lost job, job isn’t covering it, just wants more out of life etc.)
Hope everyone enjoyed this layout. The Sasparilla line was so bold and fun. I'm still looking around for more topics that I can use with it. I haven't even begun to use the yellow side of this set. Make sure to click the 'follow' button to the right to be updated with my newest layouts. If you'd rather get my posts in an e-mail version, just enter your e-mail address in the box provided to the right. (I promise you that I will never send you any spam or junk e-mail.)
“Stop White South African Genocide” and “Stand Fast South Africa” were chalked throughout my short walk on campus.
It's not just the wealth that makes Dubai extreme. When faced with the need for more prime real estate, they built islands. In fact, we stayed on the Palm Jumeirah, which is the famous palm tree-shaped set of islands just off the coast. In addition to creating more waterfront property, since it's not technically on Emirati soil, foreigners are allowed to own real estate, which isn't the case on the mainland. The "trunk" of the island is filled with high rise apartments, most of which I assume are empty either based on the economy or because they're investment properties; however, I couldn't help but thinking, "with as organized as this looks, this might just be what the developers had in mind with Gurgaon."
Please don’t hesitate to call me if you have any questions or need any help with navigating any of these sites. Finally I should add that I’m taking no kick-backs or secret benefits or pay-offs for promoting better communications. I want better communications because I believe that they will improve quality of life around here and help overcome some problems associated with remote country living.
49) Geranium (Copenhagen, Denmark)
Nights are very nice, we had no air conditioning on last night for the first time in months !
She and I belong to a mutual admiration society. I love Naomi’s blog ‘Writing Between the Lines’ as it’s packed full of fascinating descriptions of places she visits, people she encounters, and snippets about her family, all of which she illustrates with her awesome photography.
These shots were all taken in rain the last 2 days using a Nikon D7000 and Nikon 18-200mm VRII lens. All are 3 exposures combined in Photomatix Pro 4 and finished in Photoshop.
when someone close lets you down. Giving them a genuine form of encouragement can turn an event upside-down, which could otherwise cause a problem.
::: Warts: MANY level adjustments by taper - most repaired & now a MUCH better listen than my original tape. Fluctuations in 1st song settle down - just wait! More info below.
That is hopeful.
Had A Singular Gift been labeled as a children's or middle-grade book rather than young adult, I probably would have given it a higher rating. The plot and characters are lacking in complexity for what I expect out of a young adult novel. I thought Jean acted significantly younger than fourteen -- even after learning her age, I found it hard to believe. However, that isn't to say that this is a bad novel. On the contrary, I thought this was a great story about growing up and taking responsibility.
It was not long ago when I started my preparation for the Rajasthan Odyssey due in December, 2010 when I realized that the trip was turning out to be much more expensive than I thought. Nevertheless, I started taking steps to cut down expenses by thinking of not buying the touring jacket I had planned to, by looking for really shit cheap hotels, by saying bye-bye to the DSLR camera I wished I’d buy. But still, it wasn’t working. It was all because major of my funds were being spent on hotel bills where I’d spend the night. I actually thought of camping out during the course of the trip but I knew what December has to offer in Rajasthan. I was on the verge of cancelling the trip as I did not want to ask for any more money from home but when a friend posts a status message on Facebook, ‘ Going to meet some couch surfers tonight’. And aloha !! *Click!
The radial tires and solid steel frame make for a smooth and comfortable ride.
The girls are using a Tea Set, my sister gave to me years ago.
Yesterday Jacob's alleged accomplice, Michael Anthony Thorpe, 33, of Outwood Road, Heald Green, appeared before Stockport magistrates accused of aggravated burglary at Mr Cooke’s home on Saturday night. He was remanded in custody and the case was sent to Minshull Street Crown Court for trial on December 2.
How I trusted you, how I believed you.
Also Known As : Titanic3D: Ghosts of the Abyss
So as it stands some of us are trying to ride the tide of technologies, anchored in the fundamentals we try to keep our head above water in the hope that some of these waves pass by without damaging the foothold we have…We adapt for sure but we have also been victime of wastage, massive distractions and money has not been wisely spent…Whilst everyone else is trying to be in everyone elses’ business we will see in the not too distant future consolidation and the “nettoyage” that is borne of technology bubbles…or we may just float away taken by the wind, forever changing direction and not ever reach the end goal. Or we wont!
The pastor and his sheep were and are still idealised.
We recently had out family pictures taken. We haven't had any professional pictures taken as a family with the three of us, and I felt like we were overdue for some. After a lot of searching and referrals we chose a photographer my sister recommended who was within our price range and had a great portfolio. You can check her out HERE.
There were times when I felt like this book dragged on a little. The middle part of this novel felt like it took forever. All the events in this book occur within a two-week time frame but it felt like a lot longer as every day and the routine of each day in Lyle House was mentioned. I do wonder if that was a way of trying to involve the reader and to try to show what things were like for Chloe and the other misfits but I got a little bored. Had I not been stuck on a train with no other reading material – I probably would have given up on this book and that would have been a shame.
I tried out a few different poses and found a three quarter pose worked the best. I placed my photo lights around the lamp and tried to get a good exposure but have some contrast. I took the picture and cut out the background and added a gradient as you can see. My inspiration was trying to make the lighting look like I had painted the figure and I think I did a great job with it. The lamp is cut off just below the belt buckle and stands almost a foot tall.
What he said next, blew my mind. “Listen, I’m in a hurry too! I mean I just took an hour (which he didn’t) to go up on your roof! So I’m trying to tell you what the problem is. (Which he wasn’t.) So, you have a small leak on the flat roof, and another one right on that eave, and if you want I can get some plastic to cover that chimney cap. It’ll cost 8 or $900.00! Then he just writes his name on a doorknob tag and leaves. He doesn’t even give me the written proposal.
Are you continuing saying that your shoes are dirty?
Martin City Brewing - Mother's Welcome Party: featuring Towhead, Three Blind Mice, Lil' Helper, Sandy, Holy Mole, and Trouble Maker from Mother's Brewing
This giveaway will be closed at midnight on Sunday 3/25 and the winner will be chosen by random.org. The winner will be announced Monday morning. This is a fairly quick giveaway considering Easter is right around the corner.
Anything: competition-level 3-day event rider. Alternately, I think I would likely have done something rather related: science writing, perhaps. Editing. Teaching, which I spend a lot of time doing, in fact.
07 Empty Page
This is not fun. After half an hour of working with a brick wall next to me I suggest I might get further doing this by myself. He mutters " you might prefer to ask Rob."
Probably, but as I alluded to above, most Track and Field days in the U.S. wouldn’t involve foreign cross-dressing circus clowns. Looks this will be another experience I throw in the “cultural differences” category.
Meanwhile Mr. Stomach is growing hoarse and finally just flops over on his tattered sofa under the chute that always spews a putrid ooze. And he’s so far away and so far on the bottom floor that Lord Brain doesn’t hear him until it’s too late. The basement is trashed, rotten garbage is trickling though the doorways, and he is completely pushed past his capacity.
The bridge was designed by Mott, Hay and Anderson and built by Mitchell Construction and Dorman Long. Construction commenced on 18 September 1964. It was built slightly to the west of the Chain Bridge, which continued operating during the new bridge's construction. The bridge was opened on 20 March 1967. It is a box girder bridge, supported by two piers in the river and carries a dual carriageway road.
You gotta see this :)
She wants for me
Over and out!
Something Happened seems to me to be the evolutionary apex of the novel of suburban malaise. This type or genre (is it a 20th century phenomenon?) includes Babbitt, The Man in the Gray Flannel Suit, and Revolutionary Road, examples from the 1920s, 1950s and 1960s respectively. These are excellent novels, and they are brave because within a traditional form, they say things usually unsaid about prosperous middle-class Western society. The great struggles of life and death in literature in earlier centuries are reduced and compressed and constricted to the malaise of getting up every morning and getting on with it again. (Martin Amis called this the Theory of Increasing Humiliation.) The traditional form of these novels, which works so well to seduce the reader, is also a limitation: their protagonists are broadly sympathetic, are ‘good men’. (OK, maybe not Frank Wheeler.) Heller, in 1974, shook it up with Something Happened. (Perhaps only American Psycho matches it for taking ennui and turning it up to eleven.) Where those books set their characters’s unhappiness within a story, here the unhappiness was the story. Here was a narrator whose only definite quality was his apparent honesty: he did not know anything for sure. He did not care whether we liked him, and nor, it seemed, did his creator. He told his story in long unbroken paragraphs, mesmerising in their repetition, digressing into pages-long parentheses, but always returning to his favourite subject: himself.
Pages read since last update: 86
We were to meet at 3:30pm on a beautiful Sunday afternoon in Coronado, where it views the Coronado Bridge and Downtown San Diego Skyline. It was the perfect day to photograph the girl with a million dollar smile and the charming boy from Virginia.
Grease 12-inch pizza pan or spray with cooking spray.
The Elite members operate in absolute unison against public benefit, against a better life for mankind in which the individual is free to develop his or her innate creativity, a life free of war and bloodshed. James Forrestal, the first Secretary of Defence of the US, became aware of Elite intrigue and had, according to Jim Marrs, accumulated 3,000 pages of notes to be used for writing a book. He died in mysterious circumstances and was almost certainly murdered. His notes were taken away and a sanitised version made public after one year! Just before he died, almost fifteen months before the outbreak of the Korean War, he had revealed that American soldiers would die in Korea! Marrs quotes Forrestal: “These men are not incompetent or stupid. Consistency has never been a mark of stupidity. If they were merely stupid, they would occasionally make a mistake in our favour.” The Bilderberg Group, the Council on Foreign Relations, the Trilateral Commission and the mother of all these, The Royal Institute of International Affairs, are bodies where decisions about the future of mankind are arrived at. Who set these up and control them? The “international bankers” of course.
We are merely here to do the same policing work.
“I swear we need a tip jar for every time somebody calls this ‘television’ or ‘marketing,’” said an exasperated Elan Lee, chief creative officer of Fourth Wall Studios.
He squinted at the flashbulbs and kept moving. Ten feet from the car now.
Although we place a high value on the knowledge and expertise of business gurus and authors, there is also much to be learned from executives who are out in the trenches of the business world, running companies and making decisions every day. This is the focus of our Executive Insight video series.
No wonder we have a hard time keeping unity. The world of me is @ hand.
I was brought up what most people call “the right way”, manners, respect your elders, hold your tongue, etc. I was a Momma’s girl from an early age, and my mom (like her mom before her) always taught me that you should never make things harder than they should be. Your day is what you make it, nobody can make you feel anything you don’t allow them to. You’re to be polite, to not offend or hurt anyone’s feelings, you’re not to “rock the boat”. “Kill with kindness.” “If you have nothing nice to say, say nothing at all.” All of these things are great lessons, it teaches you not to be a hot head, not to cause conflict, not to hurt others. It teaches you to show respect… what they DON’T mention is that sometimes by not rocking the boat and NOT speaking your mind, you don’t end up where you want to go. Think about it, if the “boat” is heading off a cliff….should you just sit there and let it? Oh no no, we wouldn’t want to rock the boat! NO! Get out of the boat! Duh! I don’t know why that was such a hard lesson for me to learn…
Job description: …Experience with client-server database-driven applications using Oracle or equivalent RDBMS. – Experience with Agile/Scrum Software and Test Driven Development methodologies. – Bachelor’s degree (or equivalent) in Computer Science with a Master’s degree preferred.
Turnip (sengkuang), 1 small, removes skins and cut into four
In a small bowl, sift together the flour, baking powder, and salt. Set aside. In a large bowl, on med speed of an electric mixer, cream the butter until smooth. Add the sugar gradually and beat until fluffy, about 3 minutes. Add the eggs, one at a time, beating well after each addition.
As some of you have realized, hubby does not like fancy cakes. Actually, he wants cakes with NUTS in them so a book of coffee cakes should have lots of options for him. This recipe, of course, had nuts but they were pistachios, a nut, I rarely have baked with. I did not have to be concerned since he loved this cake and put it up, on the top of his mental list of what he likes.
Life's great, white people are great, black people are great!
She doesn't want to do too much promotion because she feels there's a writing elf inside her which goes into a sulk if she talks too much.
"OMG, are you buying all this stuff?" Sheila asked incredulously.
Elizabeth: When I have writer’s block, I work on other things, ideas for stories, poetry. I keep out the other works for about a month and then go back renewed and ready to work on the original piece.
Dramatics aside, I’m going to be sensible. Tomorrow I’ll go through the contract and the SoA advice with a fine-toothed comb. I’ll call HC and try to negotiate and clarify a few of the details. I’ll pretend I’m not a silly little girl with a notepad and head full of words and think business for a day.
Your quite inquisitive and your extreme sensitivity makes you understand and respond easily to people, atmosphere, attitudes, music, sounds, color, and personalities. This makes you very perceptive and accentuates your interest in the meaning behind everything you come across. All things mystic appeal to you and you feel the need to delve deeper—to see for yourself just what they may hold for you.
Black is a hard color to photograph and my photos are either too bright or too dark, but the Matte Black beads in there help to show some of the variation in color tones so at least you can see it! I really love this necklace, much more than I thought I would...I may even do a few more in other color ways!
Though of course there are some people who will look at you as a defective human being because your problems are mental, I am canny enough to not share the details of my condition with them. The trouble that I have had. has to do with friends who expect that someone with bipolar disorder should behave like a raving lunatic and since I don't, I may have allowed myself to be misdiagnosed.
